He suddenly stopped in his tracks. What was the sound he was hearing? It was like hissing of a dozen snakes. And the sound was getting closer and closer. Before he could turn back a weird looking creature was upon him. It looked like a gigantic monitor lizard with 9 heads sticking out like snakes. Suddenly it dawned on him: he had got it all wrong. All along his mission had been to destroy this grotesque creature: the hydra! And now the creature was coming to destroy him!
So when I stumbled upon two talented bloggers who turned the Ikea Jennylund accent chair into swivel -rockers, I was stoked.
Just thought I would let you know why I haven't posted or updated my offerings on TDIPT Mercantile. I unexpectedly went to the ER on Monday morning and have been in the hospital ever since. Turns out I have a really nasty case is salmonella.
I was at a hotel the other day and while showering in the bath so that I could enter the pool, (No, wasn’t eavesdropping but), the conversation of the girls outside the door, found its way into my ears.
It's suddenly, surprisingly, easy to accept this, and not miss what you can't have.
Mom has a garden. Mom smokes the meats. Mom cares for the animals. Mom makes maple syrup. Mom cooks all the meals, sews all the clothes, prepares food for the winter, teaches her children how to do everything right along with her and it looks like was even the one who taught them to read. Plus she gives birth in a cabin (I assume) and raises kids while she does all that. By the way, she MAKES the bread, not dad. And with wheat her husband threshed and she ground.
The Theme is Spring cards and Violets always remind me of spring. Since I'm an amateur photographer, I also took a bunch of pictures of my spring violets, so I decided to use them as the focus in my card. I have a small collection of copic markers and have been practicing blending colors, so I though I'd try using my pictures I took.
This week, on a visit to the hospital, where corridors were swollen with pregnant women, hospital staff were overheard asking if the lifts were working. A lift was broken in the maternity wing.
Thirdly, what exactly is meant by terming it a ‘right’? Intellectual property, in function, is a government granted exclusion which is given to innovators so that they can get back their investments as well as some additional incentives / rewards. But let’s be clear that it is merely one way of incentivizing innovation, and one with little evidence to support it as a better way than any other way. Certainly, it is the most dominant form present today for a variety of reasons (the lobbying power of industries which have become dominant through them being a major one) but should it become a ‘right’? Perhaps it is just a question of semantics, but with increased upward harmonization, the rhetoric of ipR has framed the equation with undue importance on the necessity of these 'rights' for creation and innovation, to not only the mindless strengthening of these rights but also the unfortunate exclusion of other viable options.
They say that good relationships equals happy life, etc, and it makes sense.
I saw him live again, a few years ago, at the O2 stadium, the old Millennium Dome. Jane again. ‘Come and stay, I’ve got tickets for Leonard Cohen,’ she said. In Manchester I’d been right near the front, close enough to watch his fingers flicker over the frets. But the only tickets left this time were pitched up so high I felt dizzy. Incredible musicians. Amazing man. He’d lost the lot by this point, been ripped off, gone bankrupt, had to sing for his supper once more.
Novelist Mekkawi Said saw the exclusion of academics as more extreme that than the former regime’s appeasing pretenses, and predicted an impoverishment of the people’s political consciousness as a result.
“You see other reason?”
Vegan Options: Vegetarian Gumbo – *I ate this* This is my absolute favorite vegan offering at Disneyland. It’s a delicious Louisiana style gumbo with rice, onion, okra, and tomatoes served in a sourdough bread bowl. Delicious. I absolutely love this.
So, I am thinking that I was given a bunch of crap growing up about how important the people you surround yourself with are, or my parents are getting soft in their old age.
Many, and I am one of them, have argued that both immigration and pandering to various minority groups was at the heart of the sub-prime fiasco, which brought about the recent financial crisis, however, whatever the cause, even the most passionate multiculturalist can not argue that immigration has made our situation any better.
You don't care much for a stranger's touch,
Meandering through valleys, Mountains and ghosts,
I'm afraid people who accepted the conclusions reported by many parts of the press without reading the actual papers and checking statements will wake up next week to find they have bought a motorized tie rack. Read more>>
31. Beady Eye-Different Year, Still Speeding (Dangerbird)
“Oh Roger, what’s wrong?” Mimi cried as the tentacle moved towards her face so she could see her own reflection in its shiny, slimy surface.
I took the plunge and got registered! Now, to finalize the training plan that starts next week. Not a lot of time, but that's ok, right? I'm still not above trying to head to Coeur d'Alene but at least I will get one half in this Spring in case the ID trip doesn't pan out.
In a posting on the Facebook page calling for Sun Xu’s scholarship to be revoked, Liu wrote that he was quite ‘appalled’ at his remarks:
Semiconductor bracelets are here to fulfill and theire is meet feat to farm from supermarkets to proms and from movies to churches all for varying causes.
7. Fool On You (Friedman) 7:04
2007.***E-VIII/28/1960. On what passes for due process among the Russians. Carterville Herald, Carterville, Illinois. (Included in Item C-1964(1), above, pp. 389-41. Incorporated in Item B-2, above, pp. 226-27 (1975).)
warmth of your strong arms
Well you just can't talk about strawberries without talking about all the yummy desserts you can make with them. After making this the other day, I said to Brandon, "I can't make this again for a long time." Because I eat it. And not just a little...it's so good...
ISBN: 978-0-385-66498-1 (0-385-66498-2)
Since three of the Philadelphia teams were on national television last night I decided to make today’s 110% column all Philadelphia related.
Deviled Eggs (common party food, they are so easy to make).
My dressing table is a little like my desk... the appearance changes with my mood and with my latest crushes. It's not overly organised and it is crowded... but I like it like that. I know what is where and as I am usually in a hurry to get ready and get out the door, this ordered chaos works just fine...
I will be back on soon to share more pictures, updates and stories about what its like staying here at Walter Reed.
(I made sure my Aunt was aware of this process...lol)
So has the arrest of three al Qaeda operatives in Ghana, who were charged with narco-terrrorism in New York after being handed over to the US Drugs Enforcement Agency (DEA) and transported to the United States.
Per serving: 370 cal, 6 g fat, 10 g fiber, 7 WW pts
It’s hard to argue with his logic.
Mozambique's infrastructure was wrecked by civil war, sponsored by apartheid South Africa, while the rail network has fared little better. The famed Benguela railway across Angola ground to a halt because of the civil war and foreign invasion, meaning much of it was destroyed.
This cheats recipe is really simple and quick to prepare. I love it because my kids are really impressed by this pie…they can smell it cooking and can’t wait to eat it!! I have them fooled because the kids think that I’m a really great cook….I don’t tell them how easy it is though…..
What’s not so great:
Luckily, tonight at a staff dinner, my boss said monsoon season ends on Saturday. And then there is a possibility that we might have a typhoon, which would mean rain for a bit longer. But fingers crossed that the typhoon veers towards Japan and leaves Korea alone. Because if so, my boss said that starting next Tuesday we will have some traditional Midwest summer weather...hot, sunny and humid. I couldn't be more excited!
South African jurist Richard Goldstone published a mewling op-ed in the Washington Post essentially disavowing the infamous Goldstone Report he authored that falsely condemned Israel for war crimes during Operation Cast lead against Hamas in Gaza.
Ironically, Earl Bostic's signature tune, Flamingo, wasn't on that record. I only discovered it through the internet about a year ago and I think it is now my favourite track of all Earl's tracks - the ones that I have heard that is. It achieves the almost impossible feat of being wistful, boisterous and joyous at one and the same time.............. and entirely thrilling!
I have put a few bags together but need to wait until closer to the party
11. Am I in control of my own actions and the happenings around me? What or whom do I believe in?
“The truth is the thing I invented so I could live.”
Dr. Leena also gave me a script for “prescription toothpaste,” marketed under the name “Prevident 5000.” Like I’m going to show up at some pharmacy and ask for prescription toothpaste.
This one has what I would call panic handles on each seat in the rear. I didn't see any seat belts but I think they might come in handy.
It’s not just “retard” and “retarded” though. There are so many words the fly around that disparage whole groups of people. Gay. Lame. Idiot. Moron. Those are just a few very common, very popular ones. Words that even a lot of people who despise and speak out against the R-word think nothing of. Maybe I’m just too sensitive, too aware, I don’t know. I just know that I want my kids to grow up in a world where nobody is put down and marginalized because of race, philosophical orientation, sexual orientation, or ability level. A world where every human being, no matter size, shape, or color, is valued. If people as a whole are valued, truly valued, the language will follow. That’s what I think.
Genre(s): Melodic Black Metal
1/4 teaspoon dried crushed oregano
Matisyahu emerged in 2004 with his debut album Shake Off the Dust…Rise. With the release of Live at Stubb’s (2005), which reached #1 on Billboard’s Heatseekers chart, and Youth (2006), which debuted at #4 on Billboard’s Top 200 and reached #1 Reggae Albums chart, Matisyahu gained considerable critical acclaim. Both albums subsequently went Gold and Youth was nominated for a Grammy for Best Reggae Album. His most recent release, the EP No Place To Be (2007), reached #1 on the Reggae Album charts as well.
And then, I see it. Sliding under the bedroom door, slipping through the cracks in the venetians.
and they knew nothing
Whit
The Google Book Search Settlement is a sweeping agreement that shifts the ground on copyright, and has far-reaching implications for the future of books. Whether to opt in or out is a complex, difficult decision. Authors should strive to inform themselves as fully as possible (a tour of the links below should help with that), and should not allow themselves to be swayed by the small amount of money they may receive from Google if they remain in the Settlement.
What are their minimums???
Sleek Monaco Palette
*There are only 10 of these spots available. They will be given on a first come first serve basis.*
What didn't you quite get to because you wanted this challenge to be a success? What are your goals, personally and writerly, as we move from spring to summer? And I know lots of people are attending Storymakers this week - what do you want to get from the conference?
Shadows Atlantis UK
And when the world’s compassion
MORNING AFTERNOON
I checked in quickly and made my way around starting with some Taiwanese fare from bian dang. It was crispy pork with rice and sauce. I could eat a whole plate of that if it was the only thing I was eating. Felt the same way about my food truck crush, Schnitzel & Things. Been trying to get there for sometime so when I saw it it didn’t matter how much space I had in my stomach. Wow! Perfectly breaded and fried chicken with the most divine buttery smashed potatoes and red cabbage. Get to know it.
Today's here is what I really am a Mom , a wife , a sister , a friend , a person. I'm all that stuff just don't have the title , Lol. I laugh , I might be sad. I have a serious side even though those who know me might think I always laugh. Life is real , Life can be hard at times but through everything there is a real place a Heaven where we can live forever. I wait for that wonderful day & can't wait to see that real place.
Previously in Who Had It First:
Of course I pressed #5. No spoiler here, if you want to find out the joke of the day, you'll have to call them yourself.
With work starting after eight, chopping would continue without a break until 12, and the prisoners were not even expected to appear tired. "A bandit doesn't get tired," went the saying.
I am happy the day, I see my friends happy, sharing the joy they experience in life, the plans they make for life. I am happier to attend another marriage and witness the inter-caste rituals; provided they happen on the same day and at a distance, I am reachable.
1/2 cup raisins, more or less (or 2 handfuls, which is how I measure)
And the whole Mojo thing is just depressing to me. When I have the time to create I have no mojo or desire to create.
808 State Pacific state UK
Roof's off! Again the pieces are really just holding each other together. Note the lip around the top leading edge of each wall, which together will hold the roof cap on, or will hold on higher levels if the gamer wants to make multiple levels.
I know which questions will be top of mind.
Bake at 350 degrees for 20-25 minutes or until lightly browned.
3 Steinsame 4:06
What has inspired you lately?
But i know it won't. It can't. The battle that's waged on that street corner is bigger than sorrow, hurt feelings and the middle finger. There is a spiritual war being waged...
When I was guided round to where she was, I found her lying on the floor, on her side and not willing to acknowledge me. She was conscious because her eyelids were flapping a bit and when I referred to her by name, she practically sat up... although she didn’t.
Guilty as charged. I wanted Barkley to start. My bone marrow wanted Barkley to start. The bone marrow of my unborn great-grandchildren, who will one day tend to hydroponic soybean and hemp farms on Mars and probably make a killing off the neural stimulant black market in Pavonis Base Two, want Matt Barkley to start. I can accept this wholehearted devotion to potential even if its going to hurt a seemingly nice elite athlete like Aaron Corp, who must feel a bit bewildered right now.
Following last month’s unveiling of the Special Games mode in Mario Tennis Open, Nintendo has revealed even more details about the upcoming game, which launches for the portable Nintendo 3DS system on May 20. In addition to the variety of fun tennis games with a Mario twist in Special Games mode, fans will be able to connect with friends for online matches, enjoy new StreetPass features and unlock bonus game characters through game play and special QR Codes.
Full of lemons.
So then I start thinking fuck it, This Christmas is not going to get better, and any attempt to try and make it that way is futile because the more I try the more bad things will happen. I started stressing about the kids, and friends, and being able to do something nice for the holidays. This made me feel stupidly depressed. When that happens the really awful thoughts set in.
These features, Schweiger’s questions and answers, as well as the radio content about Brooklyn from this week will permanently stay on the station’s web site at www.wnyc.org/history.
This, in effect, is how a Mystic “discerns.”
People may say I’m biased, but I’m not. To be honest, I’m still not yet finished with the book!
greetings! welcome to my blog.
This week I'm going to share with you some pages from my Famous Artists School magazine collection that showcase students of the program. Some went on to become famous in their own right and, while some others did not, they are, in my opinion, still very worthy of our recognition for their skills and accomplishments.
It is a widely-overlooked fact that the most significant Illuminati whistleblower ever to come forward, Svali, said there would be a mass exodus out of this group if / when people knew they could escape.
The Community for All-Moldova Program is dedicated to supporting individuals with disabilities to live in the community as valued and active members. The program also works to engage the entire community in raising awareness and support for inclusion. Keystone’s international work provides opportunities for men, women and children to experience the good things in life, such as a home, a sense of belonging, acceptance, respect, an education, and opportunities for work, and creates a bright future for all people.
Knee surgery hurts, that's the truth!
As the 40th anniversary of Watergate impends, we are to be bathed again in the great myth and morality play about the finest hour in all of American journalism.
2. No surgeon will touch her thyroid in her/its current condition
Stainless steel: Rs 20,000-45,000
May the Prince of Peace wrap you in comfort.
Marxism is at the root of all our problems and it was those early Marxists, Trotskyites, Stalinists, Maoists and sundry Socialists of the late 19th and early 20th centuries in general certainly who set the great ball of anti-white genocide in motion when they set out to destroy Western Capitalism. However, we are certainly not, today, where they once planned to take us.
A friend dropped me a note about the game. He is starting off and while he likes the game, he is more interested in *pew* *pew* and less interested in the sometimes grindy acquisition of ISK. (I’ll admit, mining is an acquired taste, and all the more so when mineral prices are down.)
Don't have time for that? Still no problem. You can just follow Kraft on Twitter for the latest recipes and ideas! You can find their Twitter page HERE.
Generally firm buildings so easy in order to parse, is extensively recorded, small, and to reduce replication as well as indecisiveness function is roofed with the formats and methods. In fact, they’re “computer-based that they are not often readable by people. Every day there are lots of Internet sites within Hosting. Observe all web sites on the day that it’s not possible.
Now that I did my plug, here's some of our fun trolley photos!
Audrey had her family party this weekend (since we were around family for the holidays, we held it at my parents house). I couldn't WAIT to see her open the present we got for her...
I've given up on trying to fix my hair. I'm not going to use any appliance that puts out heat when I break out in a sweat as soon as I step out of the shower. I just want it out of my eyes and off my neck. Summer has defeated me and it's not even July.
1 lb Dark Munich
Ian feels hope with how Iceland has addressed this question. This is the only country in Europe which is right now significantly recovering from the recession; this is because it didn’t make the same mistake that the other countries did: getting “cash injections” from the International Monetary Fund and therefore contracting their country away to them through debt. Iceland’s wisdom could come from the fact that they’ve been using the former “Economic Hitman” John Perkins as a consultant, see: http://hpanwo.blogspot.co.uk/2009/12/dangerous-man-by-karen-sawyer.html. When he addressed the Women’s’ Institute, Ian said: “Men are fucking things up!” (See: http://hpanwo.blogspot.co.uk/2009/04/emergency-swine-flu-meeting-with-ian.html) and maybe he’s right because Iceland is unique in being ruled by mostly female politicians and their Prime Minister is somebody called Johanna Sigurtharsdottir, Europe’s first openly homosexual head of government. So if you have any gay and lesbian friends, listen to what they have to say!
Only this is not a Fairy tale
he is her father (whatever dude) but he does not have her information.
We’ve been plastering this one everywhere we can – on our website, on Twitter, on Facebook and our email footers. We are running a prize draw and free gift offer on the day itself. It’s a wonder we haven’t been reduced to wearing T-Shirts and having it tattooed for good measure (we are based in Camden, home of the tattoo after all). Rest assured we have stopped at promoting it online.
Ephesians 4: 22-24
Could someone who is ACTUALLY a published author at the moment explain to me how they keep themselves in check and consistent with one novel at a time?!
5/10 If you like your beers zesty and with elderflower twist it's probably right up your street, sadly I live several postcodes away.
While showering a couple of days ago (side note, I subscribe to the French method – bathe once a week, needed or not!) I noticed a new mole on the backside of my calf. Aside from ruining the photogenic qualities of my massive cycling gastrocnemius muscle, I wasn’t too worried about it. That is, until I examined it more closely and realized it was a freakish goblin sucking my life fluid from my body.
Rane is such an evil, criminal mastermind of great skill that he has managed to put his own people aboard the plane. In a matter of minutes once the plane takes off, his guys kill both FBI agents and take over the plane. It's then up to Cutter to take back the plane and capture Rane, with only a stewardess to help him out. In the course of the movie, Cutter will jump out of a moving plane, punch a French guy in the throat, hit that French ponytail wearing bastard with a golf club in the balls, ride a motorcycle dangerously (why of course), beat up some redneck cops, and deliver some classic one-liners.
I know you’re never going to read this so typing this all out is most likely useless. It’s just gross saying this out loud to anyone. I find it embarrassing that after everything, I let all of this get to me. I let you get to me, even though I tried my best to remain above it all. Whether you like it or not, I consider you a part of my life, and let it be known that that part isn’t just a piece, it’s a chunk.
with Simorgh ;
I'd love to speak to Lewis Carroll.
I am not an evangelist! I am not anyone’s savior! If anything, I lead people to their death! I am a free bird, showing you how far you can fly! You can go to the ends of the earth, whichever way you choose to go. You can be as good as you ever imagined! You can be as bad you ever imagined! The choice is up to YOU!
It was all very redolent of Mitterrand, a master of the emotional and symbolic political gesture, whose reputation has undergone a considerable rehabilitation in France in recent years. As Hollande laid a spray of flowers on Bérégovoy’s tomb, he evoked memories of Mitterrand’s inauguration in May 1981, when the new president carried two roses into the Panthéon and laid them on the tombs of the great resistance hero Jean Moulin and the founder of the French Socialist party, Jean Jaurès.
so in answer to the above question? yes, yes, yes, and yes.
I cried when Sean offered his life to save Arrah’s and in embarrassment turned my face to the side, just to catch the lady beside me wiping away a tear. What made this play so unique and special was the way it would have you crying tears of laughter and sadness in almost the one hanky blow. Through all the farcical elements, the chases, misunderstandings and miscommunications – it was the love story between Arrah and Sean at the centre of the play that was the glue that made the jokes funny and chase scenes dramatic – their love story raised the stakes of this comedy and when their love was endangered, I really did want to shout out, like a child at a pantomime, ‘Watch out, look behind you!’
"So these three uber-rare sides aren't the end of the world, creatively speaking. However, as "Page 2" and "Swing Journal All Stars '68" are from 1968 and "Varation" is from January 1969, they represent something of a scene that's making its statement in reconciliation between traditionalism and the so-called new thing in its own way.
Marriage definitely becomes about reminding ourselves everyday how and why we love this person. Inevitably there are times when it isn't possible to resolve issues, but for the most part, a lot of the issues are silly things that if we learn to choose our battles, (I say this a lot I know, but it really is true), we'd be in a lot of a better position as a couple moving forward and coping with the day to day stress of it all!
OK. Now that MIGHT be a plausible reason. And me being one of those nice guys willing to give everyone the benefit of the doubt, at least initially…
On Thursday that changed when Melbourne’s favourite craft brewery, Mountain Goat, teamed up with the very talented kitchen crew and Prof Pilsner to unofficially ‘cut the ribbon’ on the Beer Deluxe Grill by treating an appreciative crowd to the first of what will be many regular food and beer events.
Don’t love me ’cause I love you so,
Now, they are “the best muffins I’ve ever eaten.” That’s a direct quote from the Wonderful Man.
- Speaking of earrings, I learned to make earrings last fall. They are now for sale at a new, artsy consignment store in downtown Nampa called Sparrow Clothing, which had their soft opening on May 10th and sold 30 pairs by June 1st... and they didn't even have their Grand Opening yet. All 30 replacement pairs are made, and now there's the matter of getting the holders printed and assembled before sending them out there.
Your vote matters. If you don’t vote, start. If you do vote, spend more time thinking about your vote than you spend researching your fantasy football team, or picking your brackets in basketball tournaments, or watching reality T.V. shows. Your vote gives someone the power to represent you, to alter laws for you, and sooner or later the actions of the people who represent you will affect your everyday life. You should spend a little more time listening to people who are actually involved and believe that what they do matters. Spend more time listening to the people who are involved, than listening to the people who are just sitting by and complaining.
upon us
Our first true outing, we loaded everything for our 3 day holiday into the van, including two very puzzled dogs, that quizzically watched us loading their beds, food, towels(good job we put those in) leads and food tub.
Dean Ray - The Earth Stood Still (San Andreas 1984, promo)
09/22/2011 BUY 0.01 chfjpy 84.768 09/23/2011 84.845 +0.96
NBA Smash
My card stocks are SU!, my designer paper is scraps, the inks are Gathered Twigs Distress Ink, and I added brads in gold, copper, and silver, to give the card an edge. The cards were fussy cut and popped up.
There is now a web site that wants to raise money for Zimmerman’s defense; why? Has he been charged with a crime?
4 socks that match-up into 2 pairs of little-boy (i.e. outdated) socks
“A true home is really about the size of your heart, not about the size of your space,” says Bechen. She encourages readers to embrace living in a small space and assures them that even the most teeny-tiny space can be transformed into a welcoming environment to maximize the space – and more importantly, maximize living. Bechen tells clients to “always remember that it’s far more important to have a spirit of hospitality and friendship as the emphasis of your home, rather than neglecting to invite others to visit you there just because you lack large rooms or expensive furniture.”
And if that's not enough, a special shipment of our very first cans
vacation of our youth, before they
And most of all it makes fun of the audience for their perverse need to watch the stupid movies that the horror genre has become. From the obsessive need to see naked women (which is hit both with seeing all the technicians crowded into the control room to get a glimpse, and again with Hadley’s enthusiastic “score.”)…to the fact that the audience of this genre is constantly being mocked for believing such preposterous situations…and in the final dig for comparing the audience to absolute evil for it’s insatiable need to see such suffering offered up to us as if it was a sacrifice that we demand. The film closes with a not too subtle call for the audience of this genre to rise up and demand that this cycle of crappy movie end once and for all as they don’t provide anything.
32. The average left-handed person lives 7 years LESS than a right-handed person.
until she flew away.
The church is built in typical Byzantine style, but the Venetian-style bell tower was added at a much later date in a completely different stone and looks weirdly out-of-place. The key is in a little niche on the left of the porch and it’s quite dark inside.
It is an element of our Cupcake Wrapper Co brand we pride ourselves in,
First goal is to find out where that train terminates and see if there is any chance our wallet can still be found. This requires a quick call to friends in Beijing, because we need Internet access that is not available in the hotel lobby. Because the day is quickly becoming a comedy of errors, I discover that my cell phone is dead, and we’re thankful that Rob’s has enough power to be useful. A few phone calls later, and with the help of amazing friends, we are playing the waiting game. The terminating train station has been contacted, details have been relayed, but only time will tell if the wallet is still aboard. So we sat in the hotel lobby, with no passports and only 500 kuai (90 US dollars) in our pockets. Now, 500 kuai will still get us farther than $90 in the states, but it will not cover the cost of train tickets back to Beijing, which is one of our main concerns at this point. By now, two local guys have also offered their assistance and are trying to contact the terminating train station as well. Before long, they have brought in a third guy, who seems to have more authority because he is getting answers and spends much more time talking loudly into the phone. Finally, they ask us to check all of our bags. Are we sure it’s not here somewhere? This is not looking promising. We have already checked everything, hoping against hope that our passports would be safely tucked somewhere. We have even checked bags that were never even opened during the train ride. Rob now goes back to the Shiyan train station where we got off to file a report with he local police there. He returns around 1030, his face solemn and tired, his head hung, and I know before he speaks that the passports have not been found. While he was gone, however, the hotel staff had been busy. They had brought us breakfast from the restaurant, despite my claims that we had already eaten. We were lucky in that we still had a large bag of travel snacks and train food which also included plenty of snacks and lunch options for our planned hike. Therefore, I had little worries about keeping the kids fed.
Time now to try and put it all together. I’ll be taking a look at many of the events for Worlds over the next three weeks, before the opening gun on August 27th. And if London showed us anything, it’s that things are just starting to get interesting!
Rice -1 cup
Row 4: Cast on 2 stitches, knit to the end of the row. (14 stitches)
The other thing is the water. West Texas is a desert--I still laugh to myself thinking about the conversation I had several years ago with a native Midlander who argued with me that this was *not* a desert. She was certain is wasn't and that I, not having been born here, was just confused. Non. Midland lies at the northern boundary of the Chihuahuan Desert, one of the five deserts of the US, and our average rainfall is just over 14" a year. (A desert biome receives less than 15-19" per year (depending on which website you check).)
“Sadist”!
“Wha’s yore name?”
I’ve purposely factored the numerator to show where the length of the coil comes into play. What I did was to calculate the coil field at several points on the axis and then fit that data to the equation above. The result was:
Length: 8½ miles/5 hours
Also I dissolved the sugar in the milk not by beating it but by heating it because that is what I find easier (just below simmering point then take off heat). And just a couple of tips:
March ~ Worm, Crow or Seed Moon
Launching off the ground and keeping control of the glider in the wind has proven to be much harder then I expected, not because of skills, just because of the power needed…
in Delray Beach.
“We’ve had so many people looking to adopt her, I know she will be going to a loving home,” Bacall stated.
Vambe*
Label: Sire
- The music style itself is very different and fun
To watch while I enjoy myself,
Irreducible complexity is not a feature that we only see at the biochemical level or in complicated organs. Many biological systems possessed by living things are irreducibly complex, and invalidate the theory of evolution for that reason. The extraordinary reproductive method of Rheobatrachus silus, a species of frog living in Australia, is an example of this.
It’s time for another round of Thrift Store Rejects. These are purchases I made at thrift stores which, for one reason or another, could not be stretched into their own post here. I take two or three of these “lesser” finds and quickly talk about them. Check ‘em out behind the cut!
I've mentioned before that I'm making the Harrington and Hannah blocks that are part of the free BOM being given away by Michelle at The Raspberry Rabbits. I love her rabbits and her patterns! If you haven't seen them then be sure to take a look; I know you'll fall in love with those bunnies. :)
Happy birthday to CAS-ual Fridays! Try out their challenges if you haven't yet. It is the one that stretches me the most.
Poorly-made excuses repeated indefinitely.
2) To Be That Man Who Dies In The Incredibly Stupid Way.
Unnamed farmer killed (no police confirmation – 20020826 family informed media), Ermelo, MPL
With such a staggering number of books on the market and more to come, why is writing important? Only a small percentage of writers have ever made a living at writing (and most of those were people who wrote books on how to make a living at writing), and that percentage seems to be shrinking. More than 80% of books sell fewer than 100 copies. Maybe 50% sell only about ten copies or so. So, why write? The wonder of writing fiction is that a story born in one mind grows to full power in another mind. But what if you don’t have readers, or at least not many? And why take the time to learn the craft since some of the books that do sell are poorly written tripe?
I hope you're still with me! lol
She’ll force you to purchase her book
Soaked in nostalgia and promising a new beginning, THE MUPPETS is very much a cinematic panacea for troubled times, suggesting that everything can be set right by refocusing on what – and who – is important in your life.
It was a great day together and a total divine appointment!
"PIIPA's case studies series is intended to present examples of how PIIPA's global IP Corps helps emerging economies. In our November 2010 case study, we described the Ethiopian fine coffee trademarking and licensing initiative. To clarify, the Ethiopian Intellectual Property Office (EIPO) was not a PIIPA client, and PIIPA's involvement in the initiative was limited. Light Years IP, an organization unrelated to PIIPA, was the technical adviser to the Ethiopian Intellectual Property Office in conceiving and implementing the inititiative. With pro bono assistance from Arnold & Porter Lightyears IP worked directly with the EIPO in achieving successful results for Ethiopian coffee growers.
“Honey, why is there a porcupine in the dishwasher?”
Velile Tshabalala – Rosita
for a variety of reasons -
Before you actually visit the restaurant, I highly recommend a walk through the sanctuary. They have set up some lovely viewing points, where you can sit and watch the birds and other wildlife (including some rather friendly tortoises). We spotted two turtles having a sunbathe on the lake's little beach, and laughed at the crazy hairstyles that the cranes were sporting. It's very peaceful, and I would imagine that it would be wonderful to take some snacks and drinks along in the early evening and watch the birds settling in for the night.
Conkeldurr (and its family) is the Gen V version of Machamp (and its family). Both are 3-stage evolution pure Fighting types; both Conkeldurr and Machamp were evolved by trading, and both have 75%-25% male-female ratio; and both can be female, even though the Pokemon looks very male by human standards.
Leave: 3rd – Memento cottage ivy, 2nd – bamboo leaves, 1st – bamboo leaves (1 x stamp off)
PTI Stampers' Select White Card Stock
Demolition Man
5. I allow myself to engage in other activities I enjoy, but with the bargain that I’ll write for the same given period of time afterwards. Along with that goes the implicit implication that this means I will devote most of my days off to writing. I don’t work well in the evening of the days I work because quite frankly I’m tired then. Constant contact with the public does not help inspire me to write.
Nothing new to see here folks, the country still buzzing over Jack Warner’s sound beating of Ashvani Mahabir at the UNC Internal Elections. 12,000 votes, and in his own inimicable style, Warner has promised to find the 14 people from his constituency who voted against him and try to meet their needs.
We're purging. (Go on.)
I heard about The SCAR Project through a post made on the Young Survival Coalition online survivor forums. David Jay put a call out for breast cancer survivors willing to travel to NYC to be photographed. I was intrigued but hesitant. I kept wondering if I would really want to or be able to show my scars to strangers, and expose myself like that. But after I emailed another young woman who had already participated and she urged me to go for it, I was excited to make the trek!
Saturday: 10:00 AM – 7:00 PM
There were about 15 mamas (both men and women, some staff and some docents) who took turns with Kali. By changing mamas so often, she never over-bonded with any one human, the one constant was Jill the orangutan mother in the next stall. Jill was always willing to share her opinion on the mamas orangutan raising abilities, whenever Kali cried she would gesture that the baby should be handed over to her, now.
Seasoning
In every interaction with your child, ask yourself: Am I building up my relationship with my child? Or am I sacrificing it for the sake of looking like a model parent? Are my words and my actions contributing to closeness with my child, or are they driving a wedge between us?
Did you see this coming like lovers too close together?
Link to the study:
Because what is known is unknown in time’s sands
"They come from Kent"
We can see an autumn wisdom
The Guru hides inside every person
It's hard to imagine Scalped ending on the happiest of notes, for the structure of the society it describes simply doesn't allow for anything other than the rarest and most isolated of individual triumphs. The only solutions for the Reservation's deprivations which Aaron implies might work are those which would demand an incredible investment of national resources over the longest period of time. In the absence of any such commitment to restorative social justice, Aaron's characters will surely remain largely compelled to operate as chess pieces do, with their rank determining where and when they can move, with the form of the board and the rigidity of the game's rules ensuring that the opportunities for achievement are mostly incredibly limited. Scalped is a comic that's congested with characters attempting to move in directions which the rules proscribe, and the more they attempt to do so, the more tension and foreboding accumulates on the page. What will ultimately happen to each individual member of the cast is of course the reason why the book's readers keep returning, and yet, part of Scalped's fascination and power also lies in that element of its set-up which can't be allowed to be resolved, which has to remain on the page at the tale's conclusion in pretty much the shape that it was when the story began. Whatever catharsis the reader enjoys where the ultimate fates of the comic's characters are concerned will most probably stand in contrast to the unchanging realities of life out on the margins of society. All in all, Aaron's is a brilliantly designed set-up, allowing for the possibility of the reader being satisfied with the climax of the overall story while still carrying the awareness that all is very much not right with the Republic and its Native American citizens.
So what is the project? Solar-powered and lit from within, with a DVD player and monitors, it tries to rethink the hospital waiting room; in fact, the cartoon-like, festive structure with a kind of external tattoo of abstract graphics, is "sited at Policlinico Umberto 1, Rome's largest public hospital, and one that has been recently controversial because of scandals of unsafe and unsanitary conditions."As an "enlightenment" era hospital, it was planned in a decentralized way, with specialities (pediatrics, respiratory maladies, contagious diseases) distributed throughout the campus, with no single central space. The project attempts to create a centralized space for all kinds of waiting (waiting for an appointment, to be picked up, the diagnosis of a loved one, for treatment, convalescing to recover).As Inaba himself explained in a recent issue of Art Review, the real purpose was “to create an environment to cope with our restlessness, if not through easing the irritation of having to wait, then at least through distraction from it."
C is for ... crazy concept really?
Last month, we did a new release of our application and this one required a new set of indexes.
10. Don’t try to be great. Being great involves luck and other circumstances beyond your control. The less you think about being great, the more likely it is to happen. And if it doesn’t, there is absolutely nothing wrong with being solid.
The little flower arrangement was already cut out ....something I was going to use on another L.O. and did not...I used a plain blue bazzil with french dots embossing.
2 Tablespoons white (yellow) corn meal
Beth tossed a thumb over her shoulder. “Go on back. You’re in my way.”
holding their breath kind of quiet.........
1 tsp dehydrated onion (crushed), or onion powder
I stood up and cocked my head to the side. After looking at him for half a second I realized I really did not like him. I grabbed my purse and pulled out my little hand gun. “I think Psychiatrists are over rated too.”
Welcome to the fourth edition of The Pulse -- The State of the Art -- a survey in words and pictures of the online artist community. Nearly 150 artists have answered a list of questions which make up The Pulse. Their responses will be presented as a series of online and print projects. Secret Sunday was the first project and the links to all the secrets can be found on the sidebar of my blog. The Book Guild is the second project and Chapter 10 starts right now!
Today I'm sharing Zander's interview.
If you don’t feel comfortable feeding your cat raw meat, you can lightly fry it on the outside, leaving the inside raw. Prepare your raw mix as usual. Then, just before serving, add a little ghee, butter or olive oil and heat the meat for just a few seconds. If the meat mix seems a bit dry, you can add meat broth or water while warming up the meat to release the meat’s aroma.
TOTAL 1,484
To reserve tickets, please visit: www.nature.org/junefive
The Indianapolis Colts have wished for this for years: a home field playoff game to go to the Super Bowl against the New England Patriots. And now, their wish has been granted.
So love first and love truly and deeply and from the heart, use your super powers wisely. Do super heroes expect anything in return? NO they use their powers for the good of all mankind.
1. Positive, Negative, Positive: As a college student at one of the top art colleges in the country, I had to participate regularly in critiques. One of the most valuable lessons I learned in critiques was how to critique a classmate in a way that wouldn’t offend him/her. Simply put, always start with a positive. Nobody wants to hear somebody slam something they’ve done right off the bat. If you proceed your criticism with a positive, and immediately follow the criticism with another positive, the blow will be much easier to hear and digest. The listener won’t be so eager to defend him/herself and their work, but will be more willing to listen.
Key Lesson: Christians follow Jesus because they believe in Him; they don’t always understand the details of God’s Plan
Cloaked by Alex Finn (ARC) (Harper Collins Canada)
Today we get up and we head into town for some breakfast. We have breakfast at a bakery and we get two muffins and a pastry for 8 soles (NZ 4). Rico likes his muffin so much that he gets another one. After breakfast we catch the bus to Trujillo which is 12km away. Once there we walk into the centre of the square and we have a look in the cathedral and around the plaza. All the buildings in this plaza are painted bold colours and have white trimmings. It looks really cool. We then head to the bus station and purchase our bus tickets to Mancora for that night at 11.45pm! It cost us 80 soles each (40). We then catch the bus back to Huanchaco. On the way we stop off at the Chan Chan Musuem. This museum isn’t the greatest, but it doesn’t cost us anything as we can use our Chan Chan Ruins ticket to get in. We then catch the bus back to Huanchaco. We have another walk through the town then head back to hostel and chill out and play some cards. At 6pm we head back into town for the last time for dinner. We get a set menu again for 10 soles (5). But this time we get the pollo frito which is fried chicken. It is really nice. We then head back to the hostel and catch a taxi to the bus station. Since our bus leaves so late, we have a bit of a wait. Unfortunately for us, this bus is also late. While we are waiting we start talking to a local Peruvian who has perfect English. We think he might be rich for a Peruvian as he has been all over the world and has been travelling around South America for 9 months. He tells us that along the Peruvian coast there have been 1000s of deaths of dolphins, pelicans and other sea birds. Because the water temperature has increased by 2 degrees, the fish have left the coast and the dolphin and sea birds don’t have anything to eat and they have been starving! Im gutted, because i absolutely love the pelicans. They have been one of my favourite animals that i have seen over here. While we are waiting Rico decides to weigh himself on the baggage scales. He is happy with his weight. Im curious as to my weight, so i do the same. Im a couple of kgs less than when i started which surprised me as we have been eating two course meals for both lunch and dinner each day and we have been eating a lot of crap such as chips, chocolate and lollies. At 1am our bus finally arrives. Im so tired that i jump in my seat and i go straight to sleep.
To get involved email: sweetandsoutie@gmail.com
Anyways... There is smoke. Dare I say fire?
I am all excited to spend a little happy time with my mom before heading home. I walk in and she looks at me and just starts complaining. This place is awful and unorganized. People are being too helpful. She sat through the budget meeting and no one knew what they were talking about, so she turned to my dad and said......
Earlier this month I mentioned being concerned about April and how it always seems to bring some of my worst BPD problems, last year was probably the worst ever for that.
See more tips for Safari:
that that Saudi prince Walid bin Talal - Rupert Murdoch's top partner at Fox - has invested heavily in Twitter. An event coinciding with Twitter's recent announcement that it would cooperate with censorship of any content deemed "illegal" in any country, whatsoever. WhoWhatWhy can get a bit "over-eager" but these facts speak for themselves.
I’m like, “Woah there missy I’m not that easy..I’m not going back with you tonight… you know you are going to need to work a little harder than that.” Again all this is said tongue and cheek, but they are a few very effective ways on how to flirt with women. Again flirting is huge, but I’m going to give you a couple free different ways on how to begin conversations with women that are very non-nonchalant that allow you to flirt very easily.
I am not walking much, or moving much in general really. I am soooo tired, and nausea is with me all day and all night. Like that friend that just will never leave your side.
I had the pleasure of being interviewed on Anthony's show last month, here's a look at that video again.
You empower us to leave jackets and boots inside and slip easily into our flip-flops with the big plastic, festive flowers on top.
I put my robe back on and made my way to the X-ray department. I was met by a cheery young woman who explained all of the fascinating ways she was going to X-ray me. I feigned enthusiasm for the field of radiology and got on the X-ray table.
8.) He is my very best friend. There is no one else I would rather spend my time with.
Then got the almost-full gallon of milk out one handed.
Sadly, Douglas died in the sinking, his body recovered by the MacKay Bennett and he was buried at Fairview Cemetery, Halifax, Nova Scotia on 6 May 1912.
It has also “sought the State Department’s intervention to institute appropriate measures to avoid recurrence of such an incident in the future”, it said in a press note on Saturday.
1 t vanilla
Nothing did happen to the nurse, however. Apparently she got in and out without raising suspicions. As the Guardian wrote, “Health visitors in the area were among the few people who had gained access to the Bin Laden compound in the past, administering polio drops to some of the children.”
Don’t be tempted to ‘wing it’ during an interview, despite how much you think you already know about the company.
-Big Judgment in an Era of Big Data
He said, “No, dogs don’t think like that.” He paused and said, “Okay, let’s see!”
Friday sketch challenge - this is the 1st challenge and I for one am glad to see a new sketch challenge out in blogland, and i have followed this weeks sketch by Debra.
Many people gave me their suggestions on what color to paint it, or to paint it at all. It was funny because all my Facebook friends said not to paint it, but my blog friends said to paint it. I listened to you guys and went ahead and painted it. The color was an "oops" paint that I lightened. I really like how it turned out.
Normally I like a mindless project to work on while TV. This wasn’t mindless, it was mind numbing! I’m not really bashing crochet, this is just my personal angst after all those ripples done years ago. I could have knit this, but one “live” stitch on a crochet hook is easier that 235 of them on knitting needles, especially when you’re working and then quickly hiding the project when the recipient pops in unexpectedly. This was originally going to be a surprise gift while we were gone. It was a surprise alright, he got it unfinished!
Being scared is just part of life, right?
But viewers must take a few leaps to buy what Jake and the other characters are saying. When we first meet him, the kid is obsessing over the number 318, and soon 3-1-8 pops up everywhere — on clocks, winning lottery tickets, significant street addresses (enter guest star Danny Glover as the shut-in professor who explains Jake's role as highly evolved humanoid). As Jake climbs atop a telephone tower every day at 3:18, a wayward cellphone gets passed around the world, touching the lives of an Irish songstress, a British couple grieving for their dead daughter, an earnest kid in Baghdad. All those moving parts come together in ways so miraculous, you'd swear the script was touched by an iPhone-wielding angel.
“Reading a newspaper means we have to process information through words, which enables us to assess the risks. But we are losing that common sense and our sense of commonality, which makes it more and more difficult to trust people.”
I laugh.
She left the reservation when she was sixteen with her wolf by her side. Her foster father had died suddenly of a heart attack leaving her to fend for herself. The only opportunities left to her if of course she didn’t become a ward of the state was marriage and babies on the reservation. So with all her worldly possessions shoved into a duffel bag she gassed up his old Chief Vintage motorbike, and the pair headed for New York. He had left everything to her. The house, the bike, and a small inheritance to help her get going. All she wanted though was to travel. To see new places and experience new things. She had an insatiable appetite for learning and soaked everything up like a sponge. It had been difficult for her to stay as grounded as she had been on the reservation. Her need to keep moving gnawed at her insides. She often felt like a balloon that someone staked to the ground fighting against its lashings.
Things haven't changed. In the aftermath of this summer's riots (riots which overwhelmingly targetted property, not people), the current Prime Minister David Cameron pledged £1.25 million to fight gangs in London. As Lammy pointed out, that sum wouldn't buy a house in many London neighbourhoods.
The formula is a bit thin and you definitely need three coats for full coverage.
Like “house dick,” like “high windows,” like “a mother…”
In my favorite news blip of the week—trib.com is reporting that fourteen breweries in the state of Wyoming have collaborated to create Wy-P-A, an IPA, to be dubbed Wyoming's State Beer. Brewers from across the Cowboy State met at the Wind River Brewing Co., in Pinedale, Wyoming—each bringing malt and hops to contribute to the beery effort. The intention was to create a hoppy, 6.5% ABV beer that, as Tim Harland of Snake River Brewing Co. in Jackson Hole said, "... is bigger than all of us."
Objections can be expected in almost all sales. Handling these objections as they come up is the mark of the professional.
1 tablespoon lemon juice
sweeps drama aside.
If you tried counting and didn't reach 20, blame it on my photography. Sorry. The little "devil horns" in the front kinda creeped me out.
They are super quick and use ingredients that most of us have on hand.
"Yeah. Sure."
I feel like I have a talent at making mountains out of molehills. That it’s my fault and I should be able to do things. Especially basic things like eat and wash. But for some reason I just don’t. They become so meaningless and unimportant. Part of me is worried about my health. My diet is poor and erratic at best. It can’t be doing my body any good. But how do people manage to feed themselves properly everyday? How do they find the concentration and energy. I resolve to take better care of myself but it just doesn’t happen. The soul is willing; the mind is not.
So, if you’ve developed a tablet app on Honeycomb, it’s important that your app do one of two things: prevent installation on smaller screens or (preferably) support smaller screens with the same APK.
Hanukkah. We already shopped, as a family, at an Alternative Gift Fair this year, and identified charities to fund for various nights of Hanukkah. We gave each of our two teenagers $50 to spend, and they picked out delivery of a bicycle through Bikes for the World, dental checkups for 10 Mayan children in Guatemala, one week of fresh vegetables for a local family from our local farmer’s market, and socks and underwear for our local soup kitchen.
Last night a spokesman said: "I am not willing to discuss our security arrangements on an individual basis.
CottageCutz brand of metal dies were created by Joanne in late 2008. By the end of 2009, there were over 230 CottageCutz designs. And by 2011, over 800 CottageCutz designs have been created. This also led to partnering with companies such as Peachy Keen Stamps and My Little Shoebox. CottageCutz® became a registered trademark in
Thank goodness it's Friday, Aloha Friday at An Island Life..her
even knowing: this large flock of Robins singing
…is Sunday, 1st March already. We have been to Jane’s today to deliver her birthday present, a selection of bath items purchased in Getliffes Yard… in Leek, Staffordshire. I hope she likes them, she is not supposed to open the present until Wednesday this week so I will wait in anticipation, ready to text her on Wednesday evening to ask her what she thought of them.
When beaten down the field, he’s shown the type of recovery speed needed to catch up to the receiver, although he’s not going to be considered a speedster. In man coverage, he has the skillset to sit back in offman coverage, giving him a chance to read the receiver’s route off the line before anticipating and breaking to compete for a ball. His ability to turn and run with a receiver down the field shows that he should have no problem playing off-man at the next level. In press coverage, something that he rarely did in college, I’d expect to see him struggle, as he’s more of a finesse receiver who tends to play better when open and free from traffic; in addition, he’d need to continue to bulk up, fill out his frame, and get stronger in order to have any chance of being able to effectively jam the receiver at the line of scrimmage. In addition, he’ll need further development in his technique if he wants to improve in man coverage, as there are times when he will stand too tall in his backpedal, which pushes him off balance and doesn’t allow for him to plant and drive on the receiver. As a run defender and as a tackler in the open field, Casey has proven to be a reliable player capable of cutting the runner’s legs out from beneath him, however I’d like to see him make more of an effort to wrap up the ball carrier when attempting to make a tackle; he tends to try to dive and throw his body at the ball carrier’s lower body without wrapping up, which doesn’t always work. Developing as a form tackler will help him at the next level, as he will be asked to make plenty of tackles no matter what position he’s playing. If he could develop more fire and more of a tenacious attitude here, that would certainly help him as well; he simply isn’t a very physical player at this point.
Hand painted with love and attention to detail...You can tell by looking, that I love what I do! I am very blessed...
"It's not about me." Max Lucado
Remove the fruit and spices. Or leave if you like a pronounced taste.
On the other hand, it doesn’t matter where an accusation comes from, the IDF must take a look at it. The IDF must look into every story from B’Tselem, every story from Machsom Watch, every story from Amnesty International. Not because I rely on them. I don’t. But you don’t have to rely on them to do your work properly. Look into every story. There’s a tiny, microscopic proportion that has some basis, so look, check, find out..
The one yesterday was pretty good size.....for a mole.
For years her world was overwhelmed with anxiety, which came with the failure to reproduce. Fear of intimacy and uneasiness of life itself, enveloped her inner being. These feelings of dread often caused her to put up barriers between herself and relationships with other people. Fear and anger became her personality. Extremely powerful emotions befell her soul, complicating her direction in life. She didn’t know how to control the anger she felt toward God. It attacked her ability to trust. It compromised Connie’s ability to have faith in relationships, especially her marriage. Living with fear of vulnerability made her life more of a burden than a pleasure. This is when fear becomes anger. Anger becomes bitter. And bitterness tended to leave a nasty taste in her mouth.
06-24 London, England – Hammersmith Apollo
This is my first blog hop and I would like to thank Georgiana for asking me to participate. This hop is all about embossing. I am new to dry embossing (as of Christmas) and still trying to build my collection. While looking for a good deals for embossing folders, I found a tutorial on making your own. I continued my search and found others doing the same. The original one I saw involves gluing the negative on the opposite side of your cut, much like the ones you buy. This seemed tedious and had disaster all over it. Another I found involved using a rubber pad. This seemed much easier and made me wonder if foam could be substituted? I didn't act on this right away, but then this opportunity arose. I went right to work and through a little trial and error I made my own embossing folders. The following are my steps and some pictures. I regret that I didn't take pictures of each step, so if you need any clarification please ask.
1. When you think of May, what quotes come to mind? Example: “Bloom where you’re planted.” What does that mean? Who do you know who blooms where he/she is planted? Tell why.
So we have had some successes and some failures so far this week. I did manage to make cheese. It was DISGUSTING! I think I can find a better recipe though so I'll be trying that one again. We had two dinner recipes that were a hit. I know many of you want copies of recipes so I have to figure out how to make like a separate section for recipes so that the blog doesn't get super long. I don't know how to do this so I'm going to have to ask for help. Alisa - I know you're reading this. HELP!!
in the hours before dawn for a little nap.
This week, I'm off from work. The engineering students have exams, and the school where I teach the Masters class is closed for the ski trip. Yes, the school randomly closes for a week so everyone can go skiing. Don't ask. How lucky is it that they both fall on the same week??? Tuesday, I am totally making a trip down to Chauny! Can't wait!
*In late December, we had applied to quite a few jobs. Anything that sounded good. We had applications out in Washington, Oregon, Arizona, Idaho, Colorado, Utah, and we were really looking into heading back to the Midwest. We really had no hopes of being able to stay in Utah at all. We were trying to excercise faith and I was wondering how I was going to move my family in the middle of a school year. I was more than a little stressed. We had applied to a job at a corporate place in West Jordan. We didn't think that there was much of a chance of getting it, but we had applied anyway. Joseph got an interview that he would go to the second week of January. We had also applied to a job in Tooele. Neither of us had ever been to Tooele. From the ad they sounded like a small practice that was pretty layed back. They just wanted a paragraph that told what you liked to do in dentistry. I was a little concerned and doubtful, but I had Joseph send his info anyway. He got an interview there too, on the same day as his interview in West Jordan. He went to both interviews and came home in love with the practice in Tooele. It sounded too good to be true, but they wanted him to come to a working interview the next week. He liked the job in West Jordan too, but told me there was no way that he would get that one. (This was on Thursday). On Monday night the company in West Jordan called and offered him the job. We were very very surprised. Later that week he went to his working interview in Tooele and LOVED it. Everything about it. Now we had a decision to make and it was far from any decision we thought we would have to make. We were so blessed to have two jobs to pick from and both in Utah!! We prayed and went to the temple and FINALLY made the decision to go with the job in Tooele. He started the last week in January and has loved every minute of it since then. The Lord works in mysterious ways.
Authority is in our lives comes from a number of sources: Parents, guardians, elders, law enforcement, judicial, employers and various other examples to numerous to list.
Sarah LaPolla: "Sarah is interested in literary fiction, narrative nonfiction, urban fantasy, paranormal romance, science fiction, literary horror, and young adult fiction. She loves complex characters, coming-of-age stories, and strong narrators." Here agent bio can be found here.
The picture above shows white crosses on a South African hillside, one for each of the white south African farmers slaughtered in the relentless genocide which has been going on since the end of Apartheid in 1994, ignored by the world's media, blanked by political leaders across the planet and thus unknown by most of the world's people. It is a genocide denied because its victims are white people and the perpetrators are black, hence it is not a truth the world allows to be told.
Student 2: Yes, you may give me a bug and a wish.
Judge Craig Parsons of San Mateo County Superior Court convicted him Tuesday of attempted robbery, residential burglary, mayhem, assault with a deadly weapon, elder abuse and possession of stolen property. Perez-Gonzalez is being held without bail pending his sentencing hearing Jan. 10.
A variety of occurrences stimulated my desire to read a Life of Jesus. For one thing, one of my pastors years ago was a big fan of the genre. For another, when you do any form of biblical studies the idea of “lives of Jesus” gets bandied about a great deal. Lastly, having read and re-read the gospels many times, I felt like a change in pace would do me some good—somewhat like when you have a favorite restaurant, but choose to go to another, just to make sure you’re not in a rut. I wanted some perspective. Moffatt gave it to me, but not, perhaps, in the way he anticipated.
(18) 3 red bandanas
Celebrates Lunar New Year with Year of the Dragon Forever Stamp
BRONKHORSTSPRUIT: Elderly Visser couple (84 and 65) attacked on their smallholding with a pipe and scissors.
This story, like the Sea of Stories, has so many colors and threads that it appears like one big, gleaming, rainbow treat. If you like nightshirts with purple patches, or armies made of volumes and pages, or genies with colored whiskers, or boys that stand up for their fathers, or really, anything at all, this is a book for you. As an incredibly smart man named Sheldon Cooper once said, “What’s life without whimsy?”
More women than men end to have bulimia or anorexia then men, but no one is excluded. Eating disorders affect men and women, the rich and the poor, black and white, ect. For example, I am African-American, and I suffer from bulimia.
And the next time you wake you lose a little bit more.
"But whoever causes one of these little ones who believe in Me to stumble, it would be better for him if a millstone were hung around his neck, and he were thrown into the sea." Mark 9:42
Hmmm… this took a little bit of time to allow it to fully percolate in my mind. With all of the listening to various successful coaches being interviewed for the latest Teleseminar that I have been invited to check out for a possible new way to attract more Abundance into my life. This feeling like the umpteenth million (could be exaggerating just a tad) set of coaching calls to cross my path on my way to becoming??? More Abundant, Allowing, Attracting, Aware, and all the other A words that have found their way to my email box since my initiation into the world of Universal laws not commonly found in one’s generic schooling.
Two notes before we get there. First, I’m pleased to report that I was able to talk Viva Editions, the publisher of Apocalypse Not, into offering a winter solstice present to readers of The Archdruid Report. (Yes, one of the benefits of Druidry is that you get your holiday presents a few days early.) From now until January 1, if you go to the Viva Editions website, buy a copy of Apocalypse Not, and type the code APOCNOT25 on the order form where it asks for coupon codes and the like, you’ll get a 25% discount off the cover price. A happy solstice, or whatever else you celebrate at this time of year, to all!
be afraid to cough.
We offer a discount for large orders and early orders. We can also accept Visa and Mastercard either in person or over the phone. Reserve your delicious chicken today! See our Free Range Chickens page for the details.
Replace ip_address_of_OBi with the fixed IP address of the Obihai device and X_UserAgentPort with the X_UserAgentPort setting that I told you to take note of above. You may want to set the maximum channels to two, since each Google Voice account only allows two simultaneous calls, but that’s up to you.
St. Helens is probably the movie that made me fall in love with disaster movies. It’s been at least 25 years since I saw it last and I enjoyed seeing it again today. It kind of amazes me that so many chose to defy the warnings and stay within the blast radius of the volcano… 2 months warning and yet staying… That’s pretty retarded… oh well, it makes for an exciting movie story at least. I think it looked pretty idyllic and beautiful in those mountains but had somebody told me that the local volcano would erupt at any time I’d get the hell out of dodge the second I noticed the first quake.
What about you? What are you date night obstacles? and how are you/have you over come them? I would love to hear your stories! :)
As I was moving the gourmet gummi bear around in my mouth for better portability as I walked back to my office… I realized he had began to slide a little further back than I was comfortable with. My mouth apparently decided that Perry was trying to make a run for it, and clamped down on him with my teeth. He was obviously wounded, but not willing to give up the fight for freedom just yet. The teeth had obviously severed a limb, but Perry fought back. He leapt to the back of my mouth and began to slide down my tongue and into the opening of my throat.
Hope you had a wonderful Easter... So much to be thankful for!
I still chuckle to myself at Peter Watson’s description of a blown cylinder head gasket on a Velocette Vogue in a 1983 edition of Classic Bike where he says it was “akin to being assaulted by a Teasmaid”. Wonderful words! I can still picture the page layout, the typography, the feel of the pages… So much so that nearly thirty years on I bought one of these wonders for myself!
Basket #2 had cups of cubed cheese, strawberries, black berries, mandarin oranges, apple slices, etc.
They got up late, not so much cos they are under par but cos last night we had some bad storms here and the windows and floors were rattling with the wind. It kept them awake for hours. I dread to think what it would be like with the old Victorian windows in. I don't know how people survived here with no central heating, single glazed sash windows and no carpets. They were obviously harder than me.
Now, I have a collection of crystals and rocks that I’ve acquired over the past decade to use in conjunction with energy healing.
My lead character Sam Mitchell is not. She's more of a loose cannon with an agenda and she's ready to go through anyone who stands in her way. The male lead, Ben Haskins, embodies more of my mother's good nature. In the midst of a unique hostage situation, Ben takes on the rebellious and crazed Sam with his wits rather than his physical strength.
describing the last remnants
The links that Uncles, Tilbrook and the majority of the National Council have forged with ex-BNP members now in the EDP, is contaminating the whole English nationalist movement. It is not just a few ‘ordinary’ members of the BNP who have joined; two of the EDP candidates next month are actually paid to work for a BNP Member of the European Parliament.
As I mentioned, it's a long overdue service. But we all feel grateful that we can honor her in some way, and share our favorite memories of our beloved Sandy.
Regardless of Reichert’s perception “that Zambrana’s replies and lack of eye contact during this questioning were `suspicious,’ Reichert’s subsequent actions indicate that he knew that he still had no `reasonable suspicion’ to search Zambrana’s car,” notes Judge Reagan. “At that point, rather than simply informing Zambrana that he would be searching his car, Reichert requested Zambrana’s permission to conduct a search. Inexplicably (yet, not surprising to this Court, Reichert viewed Zambrana’s denial as `suspicious’
What an absolutely wonderful and exciting evening it was. Thank you to the hardworking reviewers and staff who put so much blood, sweat and tears, but most importantly - heart - into this book. Thank you to all the hardworking unappreciated & underpaid staff in the hospitality industry who work so hard to make our dining experiences as good as possible. Also thanks to Brisbanetimes.com.au, the organisers and sponsors - including Citibank, Vittoria Coffee, Louis Roederer and Rekorderlig Cider, for making such a wonderful night possible.
Here is where the PCs could start out or venture to in a campaign with Sleestak PCs:
1. What were you doing ten years ago?
But I’ve been thinking about it, and before the next Buddy show, think I better go get one of those rescue inhalers. I have been accused of all things, being less flamboyant than usual.
"This is some real crap you guys are trying to sell".
“In the light of the cross, how could there be any doubt about the three propositions at the heart of the Christian position? The sheer and utter evilness of evil is demonstrated there…as hateful in the weight of guilt which could be removed only by the sacrifice of the Lamb of God… The complete sovereignty of God is demonstrated there: all this happened ‘by God’s’ set purpose and foreknowledge… Of no other event is it attested so fully that God ‘willed’ it. The unadulterated goodness of God is demonstrated there. At the cross, who would are entertain the blasphemy of imagining that God would, even to the slightest degree, comply with evil? It brought him death, in the person of his Son. Holiness stands revealed. Love stands revealed. At the cross, God turned evil against evil and brought about the practical solution to the problem.”
The image I've got it as freebie from Gina K designs blog a few weeks ago. I colored it with acuarelable pencils. I used blue and pink as I wanted to use non traditional colors. I also added some extrafine glitter to the ornament to make it a little bit sparkle.
I was currently the chief resident in charge of the gynecology service at a busy inner-city hospital and we had a busy week planned – a week full of long surgeries and although I had prided myself on plowing through 60-80hr work weeks with nary a complaint, the thought of doing another week was almost more than I could handle. We made an appointment for her to come back on Sunday to restrip them again.
In a large bowl, combine the butter and sugar. Beat on high speed until light and fluffy. Add the egg and vanilla, beat well. Add flour mixture and beat on low speed until just combined.
He said, "Oh, I hoped it would be, like, $20 bucks."
Get a free Age Defying Dermabrasion Deluxe Sample, Dark Circles and De-puffing Eye Serum Deluxe Sample and Spa Headband with any order at Darphin.com through 5/31/12.
OK, Plan B. Divide the team into 2 and run between them both. With a set of people who don't know me from Adam.
Often mistaken for Mexican Independence Day (that's Sept. 16), Cinco de Mayo commemorates the 1862 Battle of Puebla between the victorious ragtag army of largely Mexican Indian soldiers against the invading French forces of Napoleon III. Mexican Americans, during the Chicano Movement of the 1970s, adopted the holiday for its David vs. Goliath storyline as motivation for civil rights struggles in Texas and California.”
These earlier-mentioned selfish entities DO NOT like to have around them ones who can see through the games they play from a non-physical level with the less aware individuals. Therefore, as ones are awakening to their larger heritage of the nature of the Inner Self, these selfish (or Dark) entities will often lash out at the awakening ones—for they FEAR that such ones might ruin the games these Dark entities play. These Dark entities can make your lives very turbulent and uncomfortable if you do not learn to take precautions to protect yourselves from their mischief.
*wooden letters that spell out ART, CREATE, or any other word or phrase
Besides, the only way is up, right?
I can't remember where, but I read recently about using monochrome photos to judge the balance of values in the blocks. Here is my first draft layout:
does Benue aim to safeguard
6) Don’t get overly creative with punctuation
6. Assassinating Citizens: That’s right. No judge, no jury, no conviction; just straight to execution. America has set another precedent in their tyrannical march toward empire when they openly assassinated an American citizen and government patsy, Anwar al-Awlaki, and his teenage son on the suspicion of terrorism. Paul Craig Roberts laments “Now the US government not only can seize a US citizen and confine him in prison for the rest of his life without ever presenting evidence and obtaining a conviction, but also can have him shot down in the street or blown up by a drone.” Isn’t this the reason America claims to be knocking off dictators around the world — the deliberate killing of their own citizens?
Today marks the fourth birthday of "Left and to the Back", which is a decidedly odd thought. When I first started this blog in 2008, I originally supposed that it had one year's life in it, two at a push - after that, I'd probably run out of records to talk about and also run out of enthusiasm. Whilst digging around for interesting discs is actually more of a challenge now than it was then, the flow of material hasn't threatened to dry up completely, and updating this blog is still a huge pleasure rather than a chore. Hopefully I'll still be doing this for awhile yet.
Samsung LN52B750 52″ LCD TV – 52b750 Review
Petra, you walk through and wonder – how did travellers today discover it so late (voted as a Wonder of the world, it is jaw-dropping to think this was the lost city where cultures fused into another dimension) and the Dead Sea – well that is self-explanatory.
“And so the hero returns!”, he said jovially. “Come in! Come in! Warm yourselves by the fire. Have an ale! I have heard that your mission was successful, and the Hagglesmiths are safely released from imprisonment. Very good, young man, very good.”
Adventurer? Gung ho.
What finally brought Tyler to the mansion after more than 40 years in the spotlight was Rock ‘n’ Roll Fantasy Camp, a program that allows people to live out their rock & roll dreams and spend four intense days training with counselors to play with Tyler or other superstars, such as Kiss’ Gene Simmons, who will be the headliner at an upcoming event in Las Vegas from October 10th through 14th.
This week is really more about finishing the blog than anything else, there will be a lecture on promotion and optimising for social media, but considering it ends 10 minutes before the blog is due I can’t really include anything from it. For the most part the content of the blog has remained the same, the only difference being that I’ve updated the categories and tags, something which I’ve shamefully neglected over the past 8 weeks.
Animal skins are not my everyday wardrobe.
RODRIGUEZ: Do you blame yourself?
Lesson's Learned: To take better before and after pictures. I remembered after I had already removed everything from most cupboards and cabinets to take "Before" pictures. I also took Before and After pictures from different locations in the room, and I should have taken them from the exact same spots.
Besides that, there's not very much to say about the renaissant music, I mean sure, at the end of it in the very late Renaissance, we do have people like Bach, Mozart and even Beethoven. And I could very well write at least two rows of information on them (Beethoven was a deaf musician, Mozart loved shit so much that if he could, he would had written a symphony about it, blablabla), but I'm too lazy to do that and don't forget it's my article so I do whatever I want with it. And besides, I would have to introduce you to terms so technical and complex that your brains might implode.
Throughout the past five months, using my experience of marriage, motherhood, and career, I have exercised what I stand for, what I've done with my life, and I've shared that with others. I've done it in a respectful and enthusiastic manner, for myself, my family and friends, as well as my amazing sponsors.
“In patron behavior terms, the “cracks” are caused by Tryers. These are households that have infrequent, one-time, or long-ago transactions with arts and entertainment organizations and they are the most prevalent type of patron behavior.
6. I had a lovely visit with our propane service guy who had come out to look at our tank. We talked about homes, neighbors, and family. His wife had passed away three years back, leaving him with three children, ages 2-9. He was not beaten down. He was in fact, a force of joy and chatter, and clearly loved his life and everyone else’s he came across. He changed me a bit, I think.
Understand that a person can only change if they want to. You can’t force your partner to alter their behavior if they don’t believe they’re wrong.
All the majesty of glaciers and blizzards, ancient castles and quirky museums, dingy hostels and luxurious private rooms, all these days are nothing but distractions.
Residents of three villages in the Panjwai district of Kandahar Province described a terrifying string of attacks in which the soldier, who had walked more than a mile from his base, tried door after door, eventually breaking in to kill within three separate houses. At the first, the man gathered 11 bodies, including those of four girls younger than 6, and set fire to them, villagers said.
Like poor Mr. H.M. Wogglebug, T.E. (Highly Magnified and Thoroughly Educated professor of L. Frank Baum's creation in The Marvelous Land of Oz). The poor tiny wogglebug got stuck like that. Magnified a hundred times his original size, all his jaunty arrogance forever on display.
“Shut up!” Barbara took the paper and slapped the vampire on the arm.
In Kerrville, Texas, youth services were maxed out at serving 43 students each day in after-school programs with a small facility in the town of about 23,000 people, said Salvation Army Capt. Brett Meredith. With the building of a new $32 million Kroc Community Center that opened in November 2010, it can serve 200 students daily with a complex that includes two pools, a fitness center, dance studio and gymnasium.
I understand you don't want to pay for the book out of your own money to be able to get a copy to me, but truely understand this I spent a long time reading, illustrating interior art and designing the cover ... that to me is time that I could have spent on working on other projects/covers. There was this company who was willing to give you advances so you could be able to provide payments straight away (according to your own email), what happened there?! If it fell over than, a simple email explaining this could have helped, in fact at any point if you had of simply contacted me explained that you couldn't send a copy or sales were low I would understand. I currently have a contract with another publisher who pays me per sales of books percentage commission, the economics are very tough, there is no doubt, so the sales on that book are low, and I can happily accept that all payments would be put on hold until the accumilate to $20 dollars.
Oh, I can't just pick one favorite movie. So here are my top five as per Facebook.
Current Yield since inception: +64.06%
I do hope you will join in with us, I look forward to seeing your Clean and Simple creations.
To be continued …..
Carol had scouted out a loop trail for us to ride, but it was along some fairly major roads and significant parts of the ride would not have been in bike lanes. So we tried to find a local park and just use it as a base to explore neighborhoods. We checked out three parks but none of the areas looked real appealing, so Santa Maria was a bust and we came back to Pismo Beach.
I have only been trying to get back to a card show for the last 3 months. One thing after another would get in my way, from real life to illness to a host of other crap. But today, I would not be deterred, even if I had to detour because of a 5k run going on. Pulled in, dropped my admission and scanned the tables. The last real show I attended was during the Clinton administration. Yes - that long ago. It was fun to be back, gazing at the tables and finding what I have been jonezing for since I got back to blogging - dime boxes. Well, no dime boxes to be found, but there were quarter boxes and vintage 3 for a buck. Let's see what was to be found from my searches....
Throughout the pages of The Old Testament, I have not only been amazed by God’s relationship with humankind, but also I have been intrigued by the types of food mentioned in the Bible. How delighted I was when I found this wonderful website and book called Cooking With The Bible. The recipes come along with the Bible reference and story.
VESTRI OPTI: You say on your website that international Human Resources is not the same as U.S. Human Resources. It is a “whole other world”. What must companies consider when dealing with the differences in working cultures?
But--here's my NEW question. If it shuts off everything, does it also shut off the sprinklers? The phones? The alarm system? It seems that there may be holes in this plan somewhere....
Wyner C – TwoCents Reviewer
Which of the two models the PP holds regarding Muslims seems most plausible: that of Catalonia or that of Melilla, where a Muslim was appointed as head of the Delegation of Government?
Behold:
Facebook: Altadena's Fancy Food Truck Fridays Twitter: @WebstersPharm
If you are Shannon, Lyndsey or Katie, please contact me at calif0809@yahoo.com so that I can get in touch with you.
“The fact that our state-of-the-art Typhoons will be stationed at RAF Northolt underlines the commitment of the Ministry of Defence and our armed forces to keeping the public safe at a time when the world will be watching us.”
Q: What bookish events did you attend?
Besides maybe the nut who thought an elephant was bigger than the moon that I posted on my wall.
World Vision - a Christian humanitarian organization dedicated to working with children, families and their communities worldwide to reach their full potential by tackling the causes of poverty and injustice. World Vision provides hope and assistance to approximately 100 million people in nearly 100 countries. In communities around the world, we join with local people to find lasting ways to improve the lives of poor children and families.
A lot of people kind of go, 'Oh, you make videos and you get all these hits.' But it's been six years or something like that, so it's very much been a snowball effect. It's been a gradual thing. When I started, the most-subscribed person on YouTube had 70,000 subscribers. I think now it's more than 5 million, or something like that. So the growth has been quite large in the audience. I started making vlogs back in 2006 and then it's just kind of progressed from there on. Natalie's supporters have long memories and they're very patient, too. Despite an almost total lack of new videos over the past 12 months or so it's clear from watching how they react on Facebook that the appetite for the kind of content she makes is very much still there. The most likely explanation for the drought is that Natalie has been completing her studies and organising her life so that she can continue to do what she does so well. Whatever the outcome the one certain thing is that there are many, many people who await the next installment eagerly. It's kind of amusing watching the reaction when Natalie posts something on Facebook. The 'Likes' and comment roll in, numbering in the tens every minute, testifying to the loyalty she has built up by making screamingly-funny videos at home with basic equipment.
Ford: the mandate is a Republican idea!
When a woman
The Money-Printing Isn’t Working!
Where the crook-bone men make war
Once I got to the second half of the book, however, I found it almost had a dual personality. It was a relief when Kathryn's mourning released its hold on me. It's not as if the book became happy and funny then; far from it. But as Kathryn gradually found she was no longer quite as mired in despair, perhaps even able to take some tiny steps forward, I myself was able to escape from the Slough of Despond. As secrets unfolded and Kathryn learned more about her husband than she'd ever known before, the tension began to stem from suspense rather than sadness. The story became less grief-stricken and more plot-driven.
The real tangy poison of this commercial is two-fold. First, of course, is the idea that you are what you drive, no exceptions, and you can either choose to live in a grey, desolate, lifeless plane of existence as a sedan or, God forbid, hatchback driver, or you can nut up and start living, dammit, being true to yourself and the ruddy-faced, spittle-flecked Viking that lives within you. The only way to do that is through 4-wheel drive. Most automakers enjoy playing on the fantasy that every driver longs to crash through the guardrails, ford a white-capped river, and roar into the mountains, spending the rest of their lives both communing with nature and running over it. The reality is most drivers only long to get to the store, buy more Cocoa Krispies, and get home before their idiot children start another idiot fire in their idiot bedrooms. "Commune with nature" ranks as high on their list of unfulfilled needs as "Give Dune another try" and "try wiping back-to-front."
And if it gets under our finger-nails, and sometimes puts stains on our clothes
At this point Price headed off to the reception room and collected a 1978 first edition – in a yellow dustjacket, of course – of Sheila Hodges's Gollancz: The Story of a Publishing House 1928–1978, which he handed to me opened at a passage quoting himself, before heading off for more wine. The quote runs thus:
Hello Dear Elisabeth Bell Fans~~It is Sunday and I am alittle late with my post today~~had a very busy weekend and it is a dreary, cloudy, rainy, sleepy kinda day here and I am just moving slow :)....
I am genuinely amazed that there are people who think that there is something wrong or irritating about new England manager Roy Hodgson’s speech. Some people seem to think there is only one “correct” or “right” way to make the sound we signify with the letter “r”. In fact, both across the UK and Ireland and across Europe there are several possible alternatives, and variations within all of them.
Caller: Two.
I believe it is fundamentally wrong on many levels, we should never be forced to change the Irish Constitution by any foreign power, this treaty will be the final nail in the coffin of Irish Sovereignty and I firmly believe that our politicians will use it as an excuse for everything. It will lead to much higher taxes, destruction of our Corporate tax rate and a drastic reduction in the level of public service we enjoy.
Cabin in the Sky
ICaughtSanta.com sent me 6 codes to review this picture product, and 5 giveaways! Since Christmas is so close, I'm doing the 5 giveaways all on Facebook, and they will all be TONIGHT!
God goes on to reassure him, “Am I not sending you?”
For starters, I had a job interview today, FINALLY! It took me 4 months just to get an interview! Granted I didn't really try looking for a job until two months in, I just really wanted to succeed at making art. BUT, things don't always turn out as you plan. Anyway, the interview was at a golf course. Brit had found a job posting online somewhere for maintenance on the golf carts for the City of New Smyrna Beach Golf Club, like cleaning them and whatever, and I also applied for just any available position. I'm not confident on how the interview went. The actual position was just part-time for doing little things around the course, like edging the sidewalks and cart paths and sand traps, trimming trees, string-trimming, just stuff like that, which I am pretty qualified for considering I was crew leader at a lawn care company for a year and its also pretty much the exact same stuff I did at the cemetery. But I also felt way overqualified. My interviewer inquired a little about art and photography, so I told him that Brit and I own a photography business and I mainly do artwork but business is suffering since we moved down. I don't know, I just felt like I gave him no reason for me to get a job trimming at a golf course. Oh, plus I have to take three weeks off at Christmas time in Indiana, we already bought the tickets and I'm not going to work alone in Florida while everyone else is enjoying Christmas without me back home. I feel like that was the final blow of the interview. Oh well, we'll see what happens.
My son is 8 months older than Drew, and the difference those eight months make is incredible! I remember holding Drew for the first time a few months ago, looking over at Nick and thinking, "There's no way my Nick was this tiny!" And in a few months, Drew's mom will look at another baby and think the same exact thing. As all you moms know, these little ones grow CRAZY FAST. Drew's a little older now than the last time I saw him, and he's such a cutie. He's got the most adorable chubby little cheeks and big, bright, cheery eyes. So cute!
The start was a disaster as Senna squandered pole position and dropped to 14th by turn one, giving Prost a colossal advantage. Very quickly Senna showed the superiority of his McLaren and charged through the pack. By lap 16, he was fourth and eleven laps later, was challenging for the lead. When Prost was trapped in backmarkers, Senna seized his opportunity and squeezed past his team-mate on the start-finish straight. It was a clinical piece of overtaking and a drive that thoroughly deserved to win the championship. Prost was very gracious in defeat, admitting that Senna had been the better driver during 1988. Apart from a moment in Portugal, when Ayrton had nearly put Alain into the pitwall, their battle had been a joy to watch in 1988. Sadly the next two years bought politics and accusations to the heartfelt of the sport.
February 9, 2011 – 9 PM Eastern
Well, he was.
My mind is wandering across all sorts of options for my flags, but I am thinking paper so it slowly disappears in the weather, as it faces rain and sun and wind and fog and dew.
“C’mon daddy! Let’s play rock n roll!” Yes, this one makes the Hubs feel like a million dollars.
The big news of the week, however, was the picking of our first Brandywine---made all the more special because it is the first Brandywine IN FOUR YEARS of living in Michigan. The summers have always been to cool and way too short. This year's heat and humidity were good for something after all. I'm glad I never gave up on planting these.
The every day dealing isn’t just limited towards the specific region or area rather this tactic is getting used worldwide for that promotion associated with different services and products. As the planet is shifting toward much more automation therefore daily dealing can also be a great way to attract much more customers towards the specific item through web. Lots associated with companies tend to be providing the internet marketing providers and every day dealing offers to help you visit the internet business. If you wish to know the actual discounts in your favourite products in various locations as well as would like to get the low cost vouchers cost free.
"The whole damn world is just as obsessed. With who's the best dressed and who's having sex, who's got the money, who gets the honeys..." ~ High School Never Ends by Bowling for Soup
Reflect. All advice can be thoughtfully considered. Am I ruining my kids by letting them sleep in our bed? I don't think so. But I should be able to ask myself the question without being afraid of what the answer might be. In fact, I am no longer threatened by people who disagree with me. If I still believe in my way after considering alternatives, then it makes me more confident. But I am open to the possibility that I might change my mind about something, as I have done in the past.
This, in the name of God, I promise here:
Throughout the birth, and beyond, I have carried the strength, wisdom and love given to me on that day. A day of many blessings.
Overview.
...then back down to Moscow that night so that I could see my husband get his Bachelors in math on Saturday...
So what did I choose for project #1? Yeah one of the most intricate designs they offer LMBO…oyyyy…why do I do this to myself I ask? Its called “curved basket ornate” in the online library! But it was soooo pretty and so elegant…right up my alley. So a friend on FB said to always “double-cut” intricate designs…thank you soooo much…cuz when I peeled the design off the mat it left most of the poke-out parts on the mat so I only had to poke a few out which was nice. Another tip they told me: de-stick the mat a bit, pat it with your hands a few times cuz’ its VERY sticky and that will help too. Now putting this baby together…hmmm…hahahaha…the lil’ tabs that are SUPPOSED to hold it together…well they don’t! So Scor-Tape to the rescue…love that darn stuff…and it worked well once I got it going.
you basically say that computers understands the situation from the phrase you have given.
Sometimes we’re tempted to tune out “divine interruptions” of the Holy Spirit instead of listening to His promptings. He may nudge us with a realization that we need to ask for forgiveness for something we said or did. Or persistently remind us that we should pray for someone who is experiencing crisis. Or convict us that we have never fully shared Jesus with a person we care about.
(And that is why I’m an atheist.)
Be sure to leave a comment today for a chance to win blog candy - your choice of any available Cricut Project Kit OR 5 sets of directions!! And stop back tomorrow to see Nana Susan's beautiful altered canvas project.
Climate Change Alarmist Recants: ‘I Made a Mistake’British environmental expert James Lovelock now admits he was an “alarmist” regarding global warming — and says Al Gore was too.
As I was searching for the perfect dress, I realized that the Cabin Fever Sale was loaded with stylish LBDs at some pretty wonderful prices. So in honoring my own personal girl code, always tell other girls about amazing fashion deals, I naturally felt obligated to share the good finds with other fashionistas.
For everything Trees Atlanta does to beautify and improve this city that is more in need of shade than anything (except a vastly extended public transit system and a reduction in tennis fanatics and fried foods), I’m giving my $100 contribution today. I’ll leave you with this Joyce Kilmer poem that my mother, a lifelong tree- hugger, copied into her book of favorite poems when she was 16 (although I’m still amazed she could bring herself to type “breast” and “bosom”):
If you want to go deeper with God, learn more of his precious truths, and grow in your daily walk with our Lord, then this new opportunity for lifelong learning looks like it’s right up your ally.
Black 313 (31.4%)
One man in particular, hit a cord with me. We emailed for probably 4 months before meeting. We never exchanged photos. He was the only one that never asked and that in itself I found so interesting. When we finally met it was as if we knew each other forever. Seeing each other then for the first time was like opening a special package. I remember driving to our meeting place…I was so incredibly nervous. He later told me that he felt the same way. Our day was spent walking, holding hands, kissing…..we didn’t have sex for the first time for at least two months after that.
She was critical of almost all the friends I've ever had. In hind sight, this was because I was spending more time with them then I was with her. The only two friends she didn't have problems with were the ones who didn't take up my time, and pull me away from her.
So I hope this explains to all a little bit about why I am skeptical about marriage, even if I met a perfect person to marry. I would like to see a lot more work being done by the church to focus on things like fiscal conservatism, small government and politics. As it stands, I am not hearing very much that is re-assuring me that potential Christian wives are as aware about these issues as I am, or that they are prepared to fight them.
1 grabbed
Now, such political accusations are common place. Both current government and opposition see conspiracy everywhere in the actions of their counterparts. In fact the opposition often see conspiracy amongst other opposition parties. It is a fact of Ukrainian political life that those of us here are well used to.
To the inner core of her soul until she had no
Now a real conservative sees things differently. A real conservative takes a few moment to even realize they’re looking at a picture that is out of the social norm of heterosexuality…no a real conservative sees Obama getting all touchy feely with the Communist dictators and goes ballistic in the fraction of a second before they realize the photo is doctored. To hell with the genders, a real conservative is pissed about this man once again getting too close to our enemies (and after his long standing habit of groveling before any other head of state it almost seems plausible that first moment you see it)…so which did you first see?
bb notes:
Between June 10 to 12, is held in Poienile Izei, the Domnita Pension (Pension Lady) in the Land of Maramures picturesque environment, the second edition of the Poienile Izei Dance Festival . Pension event organized with the support of Domnita Pension (Lady Pension), the Casa Bobocea, and Craciun Investments Company, brings to the fore, the deeper the traditional values ​​of Maramures, displaying the skill and involvement of the people, offered huge potential of natural resources in this area.
I would like to thank Their Honours, Sheila, Nanda, Taylor Scherberger, Graeme Scotchmer, Matthew Cutler, Sylvia Cook, the staff at the hotel, the luncheon patrons and contributors, and everyone who attended yesterday's luncheon. Together, you made our event a great success.
He then made a conscious decision to go ahead with the investment against other types that would have been in the marketplace. Nothing is guaranteed!! – John Tate,
YEAH!!! Time for another kid-friendly link party!
We later learned that Furore is called “The town that does not exist” because it has no piazza (city square) around which to form the town. Instead, the homes are simply scattered across the landscape. The Mayor of Furore insisted upon the artwork so visitors would know when they saw it that they were still in Furore. A brilliant idea!
I hope you are all having a good weekend, life goes back to routine this week with school starting and all the extra activities the kids do ***sigh***
Why not shut the window?
So, allow me to list the top 10 reasons why “Game of Thrones” isn’t remotely sexist, and is, in fact, one of the most feminist works in its genre:
I opted for a refreshing pint of the Black Harry mild, which I noticed, for the first time, has a rather weird and not entirely nice aroma. Still, it watered me well as I sat near the Backroom venue surveying the bar and decor in fitful sunshine.
Now, i wish i could say that the real challenge for me was finding an area in my home that needed some help in this department but the truth is, our whole, entire house is in need of organization.. Which is why, in fact, we are slowly working our way through Organized Simplicity. But....i was lagging in motivation until i remembered the happy day project! yay! i wanted to have a happy day so i tackled this armoire in our living room.
See, the moral of this story is we need the Environmental Protection Agency. I know a certain party is doing its best to convince people we don't need 'Big Government,' but for me, I need to know there's someone out there watching over the Chets of the world. The ones who will knowingly poison someone for a buck.
The bottle, which had no label, contained 13 tablets. Each tablet had a combination of ephedrine, caffeine and aspirin. The commercial sale of ephedrine — a stimulant designed for weight loss — is banned in the U.S. because of reports of heart attacks, strokes and even death.
Later in the Great Depression, the rules for repossessing consumer durables changed, and consumers had to be given a refund of part of the payments they made prior to default. The incentive to repay installment debt fell, and Professor Olney found delinquencies and defaults on installment debt to rise.
When we speak of “signatures of the heart,” we speak of those vibrations that you know of already that seem to arise mysteriously from the realms of the heart and spine, the kundalini energy. While feeling deeply, the vibration goes out to your entire body and then into the “field of energy” surrounding the physical form.
Until we find a better way
I’ve watched it and I think it’s… *drum roll please* quite good. Not the best movie of the year, not the best superhero film ever, only the best superhero movie of the year… so far.
18. How Time Flies
Aqil: For me, it was creativity. The chance to hear new music every single week. That was exciting, going to Bluebirds record shop in Edgware road, getting butterflies when I saw a new Def Jam or Cold chillin’ 12 inch. Hearing Melle Mel talk about pissing in the alley, or 2 live crew saying they want some pussy, it was amazing, cos it was all revolutionary middle finger
David: Three
JB has recently said:
10. Chain necklace, $5.99
1D. City as Classroom – TEL 219
Rihanna has retained her position at number three for a consecutive year while British model Rosie Jones is a re-entry into fourth place after failing to rank last year.
What might be surprising, though, are the places, the groups, and even the individuals who provide support for facilitated communication even though most of them would, if they recognized what was going on, have to deal with the fact that a debunked modality is being used in which the communication of the individual is clearly being co-opted. I say clearly, but perhaps it's only clear when you know what to look for and are willing to look for it.
THE dress: It is beautiful and simple. It is elegant and flattering. It flows and is perfectly my style. It has a beautiful back, a plunging neckline and falls to the floor. I will be myself on my wedding day(s). I will feel free, and I know I will be able to dance. I am excited.
18. Tie Me Kangaroo Down, Sport - Rolf Harris
(watch the video here.... you may want to grab that tissue first)
4. Places of Worship and other institutions
It was the perfect end to the day.
Remember that it was the Word of the Lord that Paul resisted. But the Bible is full of examples of people who resisted. But isn’t the Word of God “set in concrete”? Peter quotes from Isaiah 40:8 as he writes, “The word of the Lord endureth forever” We can learn a lesson from Proverbs 14:12.
You just need to know in your heart whether you hear the angels sound,
But that's besides the point.
If we never saw you- if God forbid we were never to see you at all- though I know that’s impossible because you exist— you are there in China, somewhere, no matter if you have been or will be chosen for us because you are already part of us; we are already a family.
I don't know, but I do know one thing. With POSSESSION, I didn't want to look back and go "I could've done more."
The green curry was okay.
There were so many things I loved about this one!
Imperious Prima flashes forth
Nothing can beat, DELHI
unable to break free, unwilling to let go
And then there’s immense funding from DOD and CIA to universities all over looking for better ways to control minds, influence behavior and decision making, and, of course, better ways to kill, sometimes in nearly untraceable ways.
Essentially, every man is a narcissist, especially mama’s boys. And Filipino men are all mama’s boys.
Tail of the shooting star
And Bucket, wise man that he is, gently said, “That’s fine. We can go out to dinner, or I will cook, or we can get take out. Do you want me to come home now?”
and leading others isn’t really a desire
Considering the consternation the war in Iraq has generated amongst virtually all Muslims, then perhaps any attack, any bomb, any act of violence, in any part of the world, can be construed as defensive. In fact they have been taken in such a way in literally thousands of cases.
And one more piece of advice...if you're a student of film but not an artist; and you absolutely don't want to try to draw your way through a scene, try watching the clip without sound. this will allow you to focus on the visuals and concentrate on the cutting and staging without the distraction of the audio.
Nevertheless, I feel a great affinity to visual artists and feel that we have lot in common. Our ways of expression may be different, but I can identify with their single mindedness, their interest in certain images, symbols and motifs that they will return to again and again to the point of obsession. They see things that the rest of us miss and look differently. I always feel I can learn a lot from them and that we are just dipping from a different stretch of the great and mysterious stream that is creativity.
This is all an experiment for me. I hope it can become an annual Reading Life event.
On a steep hill coffee bags can be filled with soil and staked into the hillside while being planted with perennials and groundcovers. This is an excellent, quick and low cost solution. When the bags biodegrades the planted terrace has been established. Bags can also be filled with straw and staked in to keep mulch contained on a hillside or in a water management design.
It deals with all the subjects which concern human beings : wisdom, doctrine, worship, transactions, law, etc., but its basic theme is the relationship between God and His creatures.
Hinault: In the 1986 Tour he battled teammate Greg Lemond for the lead and finally gave up 3 minutes. Hinault left cycling at the peak of his career. He retired in November of 1986. His last race was a cyclocross race five days before his 32nd birthday.
A review of medical literature done in early 2003 found that five plant extracts and 69 compounds isolated from plants have been shown to have antitumor activity against ovarian cancers.
Tools--Scor-Pal, Fiskars punches, CutterBee snips, Cuttlebug, Sizzix embossing folders
discovered many things make me laugh, often at inappropriate moments.
Make the woman happy.
Facebook is so much fun, and it's such a terrific resource for educators! I truly love the collaboration on Facebook, so last year I began hosting a Facebook Friday Giveaway to show my appreciation to those who are willing to share their ideas with others. Each Friday I post an education-related question and choose one of the respondents as the winner. I announce the winner in my Candler's Classroom Connections newsletter on Saturday, and he or she may select up an ebook or other digital item from my Teaching Resources site up worth up to $20!
Why do you ask?
(c) enough to pay the secured creditors, being Close Leasing for at least £1.6 million and Rangers FC Group Ltd, for a sum of unspecified millions; or
Here are the tabulated responses:
and the pretty lighting over the cakes they looked beautiful!
Who am I to use the phrase ‘We, the Rakyat’?
Turning 30: 30 Things Every Woman Should Have And Should Know
Also, even if a given work or artist is somehow true genius, that doesn’t trump any real-world ethical concerns that might come with it. Art does not exist in a vaccum. The real world inspires art and is an important filter through which we view it. Judging a work outside of that context is in itself lazy criticism.
Memories of my unknown child, fade slow.
- Gavin Schmidt of NASA’s Goddard Institute for Space Studies
Alice Louise Press, Alison Events, Look Photography, PreOwnedWeddingDresses.com and Melangerie Inc. want to find the bride and groom who will inspire them with their location and design details. This doesn't mean your wedding needs to be in Hawaii or Prague - as long as the location is something that will fabulous and interesting. It can be beautiful, rustic, gritty, classic, charming.....but remember it is all in the details!
Here is a tip: apply pressure to the foam when you are cutting. The flatter and more condensed it is, the easier it will be to slice through.
4. Industry Subcommittee Reports
I think that about wraps things up. Well, until I fill you all in on my BIG news :)
Nahan is a beautiful town of Himachal Pradesh which is located amidst the lush green beautiful mountains of Himachal Pradesh. You will be really amazed by spending your time amidst the beauty of Nahan. The beautiful surrounding of that place will conquer your heart immediately and you will feel that your Shimla Nahan tour is worth.
Did media outlets oblige?
According to Wisconsin Judge Patrick J. Fiedler, you do not have a fundamental right to consume the food you grow or own or raise. The Farm To Consumer Legal Defense Fund, the pioneers in defending food sovereignty and freedom, recently argued before Judge Fiedler that you and I have a constitutional right to consume the foods of our choice. Judge Fiedler saw no merit to the argument and ruled against the FTCLDF. When they asked him to clarify his statement, these were his words:
What I am now?
a last minute rush job.
It depends on the length and what it is. I had a novel I’m working on start out as a short story, sit for years, and then rocketed past 30,000 words in a month. I always end up thinking of subplots and details when I’m half-way through things, so then I end up going back to fix things.
Well.....I disagree. Your sanity time is much reduced of course, but if you have a supportive husband/partner/friends/family/reliable babysitter, you can still find SOME time. Maybe not as much as you would like, but really? Would you have expected otherwise? I admit, I still didn't really leave him with anyone, even hubby really, prior to 6 months, but the offers were always there, I just chose not to take them and he was one of the "refuse the bottle" type babies so wasn't a huge option anyway!
That's not to say the next month isn't going to start showing improvements again. I know many parents that haven't seen changes for the first few months and I've been told anywhere from 2 weeks to 6 months. We are certainly not giving up, but still being cautiously hopeful. In the meantime, I'm very excited to see the changes we have seen in Ayden since he started on Minocycline. Not what was expected, but fantastic changes nonetheless. We'll keep moving forward and I'll update as we go along.
Chia had had been arrested in the city-state while attempting to smuggle SG$16million in cash to Malaysia, sparking a major money laundering investigation.
You may remember Tess and Maja, the lovely ladies behind the jewelry company Polli, from their previous Mixing Bowl contribution---the gorgeous to look at and wonderful to eat “I Scream Sandwiches.” I was so impressed with their last recipe that when they offered to whip up another delicious treat for Dessert Girl readers, I couldn’t wait to see what they came up with next! I was, of course, thrilled when they sent over this recipe for an Australian lamington by Polli team member Hannah. I’m a big fan of regional desserts, and this one looks sooo yummy. Plus, this lamington has got a bit of a twist to it (traditionally the cakes are square and covered in chocolate), which makes it that much more fun! With all that passion fruit and lemon curd, it really is the perfect summertime treat, although I guess it’s winter in Australia, so I suppose that makes it a perfect winter treat as well! Really, it works all year round! So be sure to try it out this weekend, no matter what part of the world you’re living in. :-)
Why, then, the unease? Because Obama wasn’t speaking primarily to Iran but to Israel. Even when he seemed to be warning Tehran, he was really warning Jerusalem. His goal these last days hasn’t been so much to deter them but us. The headlines got it right: Cool down the war talk. Give sanctions—and diplomacy—a chance.
I wanted the votive holders to really sparkle when the candles were lit in them. I sprayed the outsides of them with glass spray paint. If you attempt a project like this, be sure you are spraying the outside of the votives, not the inside. You don't want the spray to catch fire!!
Lucy watched in horror as the ship’s rows of lights gradually disappeared below the waterline. “Each time that I looked up there was one row of lights less.” In an excitable letter to her daughter, Esme, written four days after the sinking, she reveals a somewhat voyeuristic fascination in watching the ship go down and her annoyance at being so seasick that she missed things. Sister of the romantic novelist Elinor Glyn, she was almost as emotionally flamboyant. “Well, my beloveds,” she writes to her family. “You know how I always said I longed for experiences and adventures and sensations, well, I’ve had it this time and no mistake.”
So it's now almost 6pm. CPT and Jake and Joe are off to the hockey rink. Tom and Jim and Eme and I are watching Psych. I'm done blogging and loading the store. No school tomorrow for Easter Break. And I think I need a LONG nights sleep. Oh yeah.
I need all of your advice! I recently fell in love with a new rug for our dining room, but need all of your expert opinions! With the pattern we already have on the wall, is this too much in the space?
Barn door rollers for my sliding 'barn door' in the master bedroom! I have been looking for these on Craigslist and eBay but they're usually priced around $100 and up. I got these for $4 - $2 apiece. I was delighted! Some scrubbing, primer, and spray paint will do wonders for them. The wheels still roll freely. YIPPEE! Score!!
So we tried to be creative on a birthday treat. Here are the details:
Step 3. Based on steps 1 and 2 create a “Product Position and Market Attractiveness Matrix” matrix to help determine the broad strategies for each product line – “build”, “hold”, and “harvest”.
We've got Leigh Linley from the Good Stuff to come down with some of his own foody creations to share amongst the people, and we have some beer to go along with it (for free!) to create what should be the first of many - Beer and Food Evenings at Beer Ritz.
In the same said town, there was a small country church with an old board out front on which they would put inspirational sayings. At one point, their slogan was,
And let's talk about Lagunitas a minute here. "Undercover Investigation Shutdown Ale", "A Little Sumpin Sumpin Ale", "Brown Shugga", "Correction Ale", "Hop Stoopid", "The Chronic". These beer names... Either these guys have gone to jail, or they are those white guys that listen to hardcore gangsta rap music. You know those dudes. They're actually pretty cool guys, but when they slap on the underground gangsta rap that would make the Three-6 Mafia sound like Boy George, I can't help but feel a little embarrassed for the race. And you know they want to sing along with the song but it has the dreaded "N-word" as every third word, so they can't say it around you. (Too much paperwork)
What would your perfect first date be, if you could take Layla anywhere without restraints?
Where is everyone…??? I screamed.
So I held on just a little longer
Anyway, maybe this is just me venting. Thanks anyway for the card Justin! I like it regardless of whether Chapman ends up on my fantasy team this year!
I've added that 'UK' to the title above as I note about 50% of the people reading this blog are not based in the UK, although you probably guessed by now that I wasn't talking about City of London, USA, right?
All this Arabic markings crap. They all know they are swords. My source says that some flights will only make $20.00 (why they like carry on dogs) and this could cause many to not fly and hurt business.
scattering into cosmic curves.
A blizzard. We received a few inches of snow in about as many hours on Wednesday, and it still hasn't all melted off. Snow tends to fall straight down, here in my valley. We just don't get wind in the winter. So the snow "falling" just about parallel to the ground was really interesting to sit and watch. All the tension that had been building up on Wednesday simply released while watching the snow.
When a Florida preacher threatened to burn the Quran we demanded retribution. When we dragged the head of a cow through the streets or confiscated several thousand copies of the Bible before defacing them, we weren’t even aware of the hypocrisy.
And the pie was pretty delicious. Maybe the first bite wasn’t as amazing as I had anticipated, but with such fantastic reviews and so much surrendered time, I think my expectations may have been a bit unrealistic. I was envisioning a Bree Vandacamp award winning pie. But it was sweet and tart, the crust was perfect, and it just got better and better with each passing day as the flavors melded together in the fridge.
You cannot unschool part time: for two hours a day or every Friday or one week out of every month. Unschooling is a whole lifestyle and radically different way of looking at learning and life. It's not something you can just turn on and off!
You gotta love the bad people that life throws at us to!
It’s the words of Jesus to Martha before He raises Lazarus from the dead and she (Sister Marie Simon-Pierre) said that scripture helped sustain her through the darkness of her illness until she was healed. And then, she said, that at the Beatification (Ceremony) of John Paul II, on Divine Mercy Sunday, she said, ‘I saw the glory of God.’
I buy plants and have gardens wherever I live, the hard part is that when we leave, they can't come with us.
* Baby kicks feel like bubbles at first. I hadn't realized that Toby had been kicking until a nurse told me that--then I started noticing them all the time!
Coming up with another upbeat, not-at-all weird or scary, anti-stimulus(?)/anti-tax commercial.
Hail the nesting birds on every branch and nook and cranny.
millionaires and billionaires?
I found lots of the accessories, cover-ups, shoes, bags, etc. to be things that can be found elsewhere... not in exact replica, but similar. The images I chose are of things I felt were fresh (at least to my eyes).
Q: What was the process of getting your first novel published? For example, was it the first novel you'd actually written, or did you have abandoned projects? How many queries did you send out before you got a bite, and how did you decide which agents to contact?
Books, catalogues, and manuals can be updated online and newer versions are available within minutes.
some people need some kindness
Nail art kit there are endless design options with this awesome nail art kit. its contents: a professional brush, two professional sponges and two wooden sticks. the brush is ideal for creating unique lines, stripes and dots with its ultra-fine tip. the professional sponges are great for urban airbrush designs or the ultimate marble-look – now they’re totally easy to achieve in the comfort of your own home! there’s no limit to your creativity and you’re sure to have lots of fun! the nail art kit comes in a practical zip-pouch including instructions for marbling, nail painting and sponging. available in 01 mix 'n' nail style.
1. Follow Jolts & Jollies through Google Friend Connect or RSS Feed
What's can you get out of the deal??
To put it bluntly, if we were to treat our boyfriends or girlfriends the way we treat Him, how long do you think they’d stay with us? “All right, honey, I have met my thirty-minute quota of personal time with you for the day. Now I’ve got that out of the way, I’m going to do my own thing. Talk to you tomorrow.”
We are each of us angels with only one wing. And we can only fly embracing each other.
Stickles Christmas red & Diamond
Many highly skilled technicians with photographic software exist, just as previously there were experts with expensive complex equipment and specialised processing knowledge, but it seems that the most technically brilliant often lack the artistic eye. John is an extraordinary exception, for he is really an artist who uses photography. Photographers tend to record reality and the best do that really well, but John creates amazing fantasy from reality! He is not only technically very skilful; he is also highly imaginative and very artistic.
I wanted to show you a close up of the pinwheels as I added a dot to the center of each with the Stardust Clear Gel pen. Have you enjoyed these MW samples? I guess I better get some more paper ordered! Don't need any prompting to do that!
This is the airplane, a life that is according to the flesh. As for me, I have now begun to attempt to think and pray in terms of being both ready and able to face decisions based on a mind that is set on the things of the Spirit which is life and peace. I know I will have times of failure, but I also look forward to the times I jump, and in so doing, will KNOW my savior, and the wonderful joy that accompanies this intimacy, in new ways.
Democrats/liberals:
10/15/2007 66.80
I have been quite faithful in maintaining my journal, or morning pages, and most days quite look forward to it. Today was no exception, however the day started off at a pace faster than I first appreciated and I missed that first crucial step, relax and write.
1/2 of a red onion, thinly sliced
Just a reminder for people to watch all those ‘She Production Podcasts’ that have been coming out for months now. These provide a great insight into the workings and the preparations of the February show, as well as introducing the cast and the crew who are making this all possible.
I’m so glad to see the UK taking a lead on thinking “outside the box” on issues around aging and dementia and for remembering that malnutrition and aging is just as important as obesity management. Well done!
Heat the olive oil in a large oven proof saute pan over medium heat, add the onions and cook for about 5 minutes until translucent. Add the garlic, red pepper flakes and dried oregano and cook for 1 minute more. Add the vodka and continue cooking until the mixture is reduced by half.
‘OK. The husband’s job seems to be going well.’
and we paint our faded love on its aging wall.
This week has seen a lovely cross section of crafting going on, cards will always be a favourite with most crafters of course but some playmates have brought some goodies to show that are even more adventurous, read on.
1/2 cup red or yellow bell pepper (cut into thin strips)
This here is The Australian Women's Weekly 'Cakes, biscuits & slices' recipe book which my sis gave me. It's filled with some really simple recipes. I decided to try out the recipe below from this book as this treat is one of my favs. I've learnt a few things along the way. This is the recipe as it appears in the book.
the cash machine
Everything else gos to storage.
The problem was, we would always get caught. The coloured sugar would stain our mouths an unnatural green or a Rudolph red. Somehow this never got past Mom! Which wasn’t great before supper. But the scolding we may have received never really diminished our fun, and more cookies would be eaten again. Maybe Mom didn’t really mind either- hungry kids are not usually happy kids, and besides she didn’t have to bake!
Organize with your neighbors and form a community watch group during pruning operations in you neighborhood or along your street. Get local media involved. Make sure your local municipal officials know about this issue, as well. Make noise and be visible!
to minister to him,
At least I can take some comfort in knowing I am not alone.
Rolling like waves and flapping like Ulysses
67. The Secret (not the psuedo-doc, this has Duchovny in it)
There you have it. Follow the training program through each of the 3 steps and you will be amazed at how effective you can be as you develop mastery of all the tools at your disposal.
Thankfully Mom has rallied and most likely will be released from rehab this week. We don't think she should stay at home any longer though and we (my sister and my brothers and I) are trying to find an assisted living facility for her. Even though my sister lives with my mom, she is not able to give her the amount of care that my mom now needs. It's something that has been coming and we are glad we are going to be able to make this change.
Now it is a collector driven market. This goes back to his point about how no one votes anymore. Not the dealers, or the critics or the magazines. Only the collector votes because they are buying and their money is talking. This results in a system that is very front heavy. And the only sign of quality or validity is if the work sells.
What’s clear is we will see a variety of exhaust positions being tested and raced next year. Certainly the exhaust position we see on the launch car will not always be what we will see in Australia for the first race.
The Spiral Dance, also called the Grapevine Dance and the Weaver’s Dance, is a Neopagan group dance emphasizing community. It is especially popular at festivals due to its accommodation of large numbers of people.
This is the same dynamic that lead to the rise of personal computing in the mid 1970s, when Intel and Motorola chips allowed amateurs to build cheap but powerful PCs in their garages. Among these amateur enthusiasts were Steve Wozniak and Steve Jobs. In only two years, the PC progressed from the Altair 8800 in 1975, a machine so crude that it communicated with the user via a cryptic series of blinking lights and switches, to the Apple II in 1977. The Apple II had a keyboard and monitor and became a must-have piece of office equipment. Progress may not be quite so rapid in the homebrew 3D printer scene, but when I put the question to industry leaders they broadly agree that high-end multi-material and print quality will inevitably percolate down to the desktop consumer devices.
the art is nice, the story is cute and full of humor so if you want a few laughs then try this one
QUINWING A, Samij Datta, 2012
Request from a Brighton researcher for help with research on men in civil partnerships.
I have needed to scrap this photo for a long time and finally got around to it. I just don't like doing sports LOs at all so I kept putting it off! There were other photos with it, but I decided not to scrap them and only scrap this cute photo of Ryan and I from the Vikings game back in Dec. 2010.
Hi Loves,
Other supplies used for this card:
Onto other news. Yesterday my school's Doctor of Physical Therapy program had the White Coat Ceremony where the newbies, like me, get our super sweet white coats. The ceremony is supposed to symbolize our transition into the physical therapy profession now and not just when we graduate. So I have a cool new white coat!
Now let's talk about Bob. Bob wasn't married, and so he didn't worry too much about how much money he was making because he didn't have a family to support. He didn't have many expenses. He just earned a small pay and lived quite comfortably himself, until he married when he was quite a bit older. As soon as he married, he began earning more and doing better for himself. But had he worked hard and demanded fair pay when he was 22, he would be in a much better financial situation today.
“Stay” by Erykah Badu (from Live, 1997)
She babysat for her sister all summer. Her sister who lives 5 minutes away from me. Melissa texted me again late last week to ask me why we never come over anymore, even though I have told her 3 times now, that Tee works on weekends. Since she doesn't drive, we have to be here to take her and it's just not possible for us to come over there on weekends, and on weeknights Lloyd works too late for that to be feasible either. I told her she could come here anytime she wanted, and she tried to tell me that she can't afford the gas. I know her sister paid her to babysit, and she tried to pretend it was only enough to pay for the gas, but I know her sister. She pays her very generously, even when dropping her son off at Melissa's house to babysit. And seriously - 5 fucking minutes...you have to pass my house to get the highway. You didn't stop because you didn't need anything. And why is it ok for her to not want to spend gas money, but not us? I don't have a free gas pump in my front yard, bitch. Or money falling out my ass the way she seems to think.
Obama: I don't know! That's why I'm asking you.
Vasile noted that the text is very well-written and thought out, which may seem arbitrary – but in fact worth remembering. Visions pertain to questions in the preambles, and the interpretations are calculated. Laura noted that Ezra must enter into the city in order to receive knowledge and understanding, which is quite esoteric. She was reminded of a similar story of three rabbis entering a city for knowledge in the Mishnah. Todd asked the poignant question of whether the revelation points towards the future or a present reality – this is especially worth considering with the reorientation of Judaism away from the Temple and towards the Tanakh. Nidhani noted that 4 Ezra is working through the problem of how to atone for Israel’s sin now the Temple is destroyed – how can Israel prevent another future catastrophe as warned by the visions without sacrifice? Perhaps another way is to endure punishment and to follow the law – 4 Ezra mourns the cessation of Temple sacrifice, but emphasizes the Torah (culminating in his writing it in chapter 14) and the sins of Israel from not following the Law, not improper sacrifice, eating blood, or other Temple-centred mishegas. The group wondered what 3000 years in 10.45 pertains to. We did not reach an answer on this, but it could pertain to Noah.
My friend Cindy recently introduced me to her friend Monica, who asked me to make cookie favors for her daughter's upcoming birthday party. Since her daughter loves pigs, she wanted them to be piggy cookies. But not just regular piggy cookies - she wanted the pigs to be standing upright, and wearing green bikinis! It was going to be a pool party after all, and her daughter's favorite color is green.
But, in deciding what I would do with the funding, I came to a few important realizations: (1) that I am ready to begin work on writing on some of the topics that I have been researching and thinking about since I left graduate school eight years ago and (2) that I know what the core idea of the writings will be about.
"Our results suggest that limiting global warming to 2 degrees Celsius above preindustrial conditions may not be sufficient to avoid serious increases in severely hot conditions," Diffenbaugh said.The study predicts that "an intense heat wave – equal to the longest on record from 1951 to 1999 – is likely to occur as many as five times between 2020 and 2029 over areas of the western and central United States." In other words, imagine you are 60 years old or so, and think of the absolute most extreme heat wave you've experienced in your entire life.
I was in a bad enough mood about this asshat kicking me from his lame-ass guild before he turned out to be some fucking Alliance out in Theramore. And before he decided to go all personal. And racist, did I mention racist? Goddamn fucking human.
These things were delicious. The sauce tastes exactly like the famous chicken dish you can find in probably every Chinese restaurant in America: General Tso’s Chicken (or General Tsao’s, I forget which one it is at Peking’s in Athens). As you can see, the wings themselves are rather large. Also, notice that the carrots are glazed, reminiscent of Carrots Vichy. We destroyed these wings. In fact, before I could even take a photo, one of my companions had already devoured a roll and one of the wings, creating a noticeable vacant spot on the right. She apologizes profusely.
*tweezers (long handle) optional
“Stealing your woman,” I said nonchalantly.
A cynic and a sinner, he wishes he had a god
* Ms Bernadette McGrath, Manager of International Centre for Digital Content Programme, Liverpool (have a look at the excellent http://www.pocketpictures.org.uk/); “The Moblogging-PocketPictures Project”
4. Tampa Bay Buccaneers
1. Blend the cashews with the water, agave, and matcha for 1-2 minutes (yes, it is a long time, but you want the mixture to be VERY smooth and creamy). Make sure there are no clumps.
The speakers and sponsors dinner.
I dropped in to Market Organics, just on the chance that maybe I’d get lucky, or at least run into a massive selection of cruelty-free skin care. They had recently gotten in GT’s Kombucha drinks! I was psyched. I didn’t feel like carrying too much, at the time, so I only bought two, at $3.99 each. But I found out they also offer a 10% student discount everyday.
Whatever challenges you most you have to work through it...you also have to work even harder to give yourself the time to work through it. I have to read a total of 10 scripts for 2 assignments. My professor cut me a break so I now only have to read 5.
It makes sense, doesn’t it? Scenes like The Call To Adventure and Crossing the Threshold (and on the darker side, the Visit to Death or All is Lost scene) are magical moments: they change the world of the main character for all time, and as storytellers we want our readers or audiences to experience that profound, soul-shattering change right along with the character.
1. Set oven to 325 degrees F. Spray a 9" x 5" loaf pan with baking spray and flour lightly. Set aside.
Stay classy,
Honeycomb & Vanilla by Kshocolat
take care of this vine,
If you would like to have a go at this palette, just create something using these colours and load it HERE. Jobs done!
My book is set in a near-future Moscow with the main male character named Artyom and a segment of the very poor populace living underground in the abandoned metro system.
Mark Walker
ROMNEY: Two — two major flaws with President Obama’s foreign policy.
We have also seen Lotus (nee LRGP) use torque reaction from the front brake callipers to extend the pushrod under braking, creating an anti-dive effect and prevent the nose dipping under braking.
As we change and grow and move towards fulfilling our potential, free from mind chatter that slows us down, we also begin to change those around us. And one by one, the change spreads. You are good, and strong, and kind and of value. Make sure your mind chatter is telling you the same thing, or else tell it to STOP, so that you can GO forward.
The website of the German District of the Society of Saint Pius X (FSSPX / SSPX) relays the reports from Italian news agency ANSA and German weekly Der Spiegel, indicated by La Stampa yesterday that the Congregation for the Doctrine for the Faith will analyze and forward to the Holy Father their opinion on the response to the doctrinal preamble delivered by the Superior General of the SSPX, Bp, Bernard Fellay, on April 17. "The pope will have the final word."
Wind isn’t free of cheap.
*for the beauty of the Rocky Mountains - I love Georgia, but the scenery here is stunning. We went back to Rocky Mountain National Park this morning and it took our breath away. I'm also tickled that we got to see some elk up close, a coyote, and various and sundry other wildlife. The camp guy and I also had a chance to spend some time with a friend we don't see very often. Thanks for joining in on our adventure, K.
How we see ourselves on the outside is directly related to how we see ourselves on the inside.
-Cardigan-Banana Republic
were you always
The construction of substantial houses likewise becomes absurd if they must soon be abandoned. Hence the hunter's very ascetic conceptions of material welfare: an interest only in minimal equipment, "if that; a valuation of smaller things over bigger; a disinterest in acquiring two or more of most goods; and the like. Ecological pressure assumes a rare form of concreteness when it has to be shouldered. If the gross product is trimmed down in comparison with other economies, it is not the hunter's productivity
Not so. I, just like the next girl, like pretty things. As a child, I dreamed of a little farmhouse with a cute picket fence beckoning you to come to the porch and sit a while.
As attractive as closure through trade-in might be, I think we ought to take a tip from the Vikings; when someone dies, we put them in their own car, set the thing on fire, and send it rolling down a symbolic stretch of freeway. More impressive by far, and a move that would certainly be supported by the automakers.
I submitted the partial on my option book to Dear Editor, another funny teen girl contemp, this one called GOODBYE, REBEL BLUE. Rebel – short for Rebecca – is the anti-Chloe. She’s a snarky, artistic outcast who reluctantly completes the bucket list of a do-gooder dead classmate and while en route meets up with a hot guy with dimples and a gimpy dolphin. Next up: revisions on my BIG book. It’s about Venice and dark arts and star-crossed lovers.
Wait for sales to use your coupons.
So. The new blog.
The next call was to our church. I knew Jeff would want Father Jim to pray with us before the surgery. I requested Jeff be added to the parish prayer chain. Both requests were granted.
For men its the testosterone which gives them large bones and body frame, more body hair, deeper voices, and the drive and desire to protect, procreate (I personally think this one is shared between men and women), make money and to kill things (hunting/gathering).
Heart Crazy on you US
Brianna wears a dress from Maggie's trunk
Here are the details of my bill:
Although Razak Baginda was charged with abetting her murder, he was released without having to put up a defence.
(I wanted to get a photo, but they were gobbled up too fast!)
“She looks good on my arm. Men envy me and women find me all the more attractive because of her.”
8 oz mushrooms, diced small
This never happens here! That's why we all collectively lost our shit.
Forget trying to pull up a mature onion from above the ground. Even if it has rained for a week and the ground is super soft and you may get a giant bulb when you pull, but you, my friend, have been fooled. The onion conspires to make fools of us all. A jokester. There in your valiant fist will be the green hair of its hollow tubular leaves and dangling like a beheaded Catholic in Henry the Eighth’s courtyard will be the gleaming white bulb. You’ve got it! “Ahha,” you think. But you would be wrong, because lurking beneath the surface will be half a dozen tiny bulblets that have peeled off, unbeknownst to you, settling in to live independently of the main mother bulb, just waiting to grow up, bloom a big flower of infinitesimal bulb-like seeds, the wind will blow and well….this is why they are invasive. You can’t get rid of them. I discriminate in this regard. I love every kind of onion for eating, all members of the allium family from garlic to shallots to scallions to purple onion. Equally in the yard I love the onions, don’t mind that they grow faster than any other of the “grasses,” think they are actually pretty in large patches and love love love the way they smell when freshly mowed. But in my garden beds? Gggrrrr.
By Aprilynne Pike
Gruevski’s VMRO DPMNE submitted the draft for the new lustration law earlier this month, after the existing lustration law became ensnared in the Constitutional Court.
Let each blogger know that you have tagged them.
is from the
Until, that is... it was observed, for all it's winning ways, the wren harbored a wicked secret. Away from the admirable nest building and romantic crooning it was discovered sneaking into the nurseries of other cavity nesting song birds, such as the beloved Bluebird, and piercing the unprotected eggs fatally with its needle like beak.
Judge: The jury will not consider this in their verdict. Continue Goo.
“This strange little film is called Luminaris, and it was created by Juan Pablo Zaramella from Buenos Aires.
This has created a waiting list, but it's most important to us to be able to confidently integrate everyone into the group in a positive way.
Nope. Plenty of Mangoes almost ready...I have to admit, I have a bit of a love/hate relationship with this tree. The mangoes love to fall about 5 mins after I leave the house in the morning, so they are beautifully rotten and chewed by squirrels by the time I get home...Ok maybe other critters but squirrels are cute so I like to think it's them.
You heard me: Dracula has such a Jewish tone to his voice that you expect Mel Brooks had a hand in things. But no: this is more like if they re-did Woody Allen's What's Up Tiger Lily?, only not as funny.
He has noticed my toe nails. They've been sparkly lately.
Michael hadn't always hated his wife. I suppose that goes without saying. Who gets married to someone they hate? The hatred came slowly, from a 'honey-do' list, and on to little ways of controlling his life. It could be argued that he was overreacting to a normal marriage, but that's beside the point now, his marriage will never be normal again.
Transcendental. And it surrounds our island...
One of my resolutions this year is to be better about writing in my journal. Sometimes I think it's easy to justify my scrapping pages or personal blog entries as enough of a record of my life. But there's just something about the idea of physically writing things down that seems so much more "real." And even though I hate to admit it, there are some things that can't really be scrapped, but I don't want to forget them. So, with the help of my creative team, I've compiled a list of 368 journal prompts - one for every day of the year, plus some - to help get my brain moving and to jog those memories of days past - and present. Then, using my Resolutionary kit, I've created a beautiful hybrid journal cover and labels for a jar to keep the prompts in. Now I can simply draw a prompt out of the jar each day and start writing! Does this sound like something you'd like to do as well? Then you're in luck, because I've packaged it all up and now you can grab it from my store! :D
Fall equals pumpkins to me - trips to the pumpkin farm, pumpkin bread, pumpkin muffins, pumpkin pancakes, pumpkin pie and pumpkin cheesecake! So amidst all this sweet stuff, I was really excited to try this weeks recipe. It was delicious! I loved the bacon stuffing and used a combination of cheddar and Gruyere cheese. It was really quick to prepare which is always a plus. As suggested I served it with a side salad. This dish will be the perfect Thanksgiving dish for my vegetarian sister in-law (minus the bacon).
Capcicum : 1/2 cup(finely chopped)
Hi there! Hope you are all having a great week so far! Today I am excited to share with you that over on the Melissa Frances blog, two of my recent published cards are being shared! If you visit me often, you already know how much I love her products and I would be tickled pink if you would check it out HERE and maybe leave some love :) I am SUPER excited because I am taking TWO classes this upcoming weekend that are being taught by THE Melissa Frances!!! Can't wait! That is my happy news for the day!
soaking up those last few rays
Posts Coming Up in May
With Disney, and Cronkite, and Martin Luther
You changed my life and all my goals.
It turns out that Heifer International is a very cool program. Livestock, trees and seeds are given to needy recipients along with instructions on how to use them to better their lives. These things are purchased by donations from you and I,… and little 5-year-old girls.
Travel by horse-drawn cart through the lush, green countryside to the Victorian estate of Muckross House, where you’ll enjoy a privately guided tour. Hike or bike through the picturesque gardens and waterfalls of Killarney National Park, a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
I have to admit that I kind of felt like Bozo the clown when I glanced down and saw such hot colored round toed shoes. I am just not sure if I like them on me anymore....... I have been thinking about giving them to Kasmira because they look so cute on her and because I haven't been wearing them much. What do you think? Keep or give?
When I posted my initial article I had absolutely no insider-knowledge of the case, and to this day I still have none. My initial interest in the matter was spurred on by the passion I have for firearms and forensic ballistics, and also my awareness of the upsetting and sensitive issues related to farm murders in South Africa.
When I think of the Dutch music scene it's really just Urfaust, a band I was lucky enough to catch this past summer. Beyond that, I'll be honest I don't listen to this scene it that often. Thankfully, due to your seeming enjoyment of this series, and a general thirst for new music, I've come upon a few new acts as well as older ones I've had sitting around forever that ya'll might like.
Here are some of my favorites that are inspiring my upcoming work projects and fashion decisions. THANKS FOR THE GENIOUS!
Questions come back to haunt UBS
It's party city for Aquarians! Take a vacation if you can. The next six weeks are all about romance, flirtations, love affairs, meeting new love, reigniting existing love, plus attending social events, the theatre, movies, and sporting events. Playful activities with children will also be fun. Do take note: you're very much in touch with your creative urges now, so not only are you hot and sexy in bed, you're wonderfully creative with the arts as well. Artists can be especially productive in the next month. Basically, you like who you are right now. You're happy inside your own skin, and this contentment makes you glow! Go out and flash your dazzle!
And so begins the list of the things he did as a 6 years old.
Last year Houston experienced a significant drought.
Carter Mull (1 chromogenic color print with pasted chromogenic color print, 2009)
While it may be a stretch to tie interest rates on student loans into the ostensible GOP “war on women” (and, really, casting every single disagreement as a “war” degrades both parties), at least Democrats are highlighting the costs of offsets. Republicans were indignant when President Obama referred to the Ryan budget as “social Darwinism,” yet days later, the GOP floats a proposal that pits students against women and against the rest of the middle class. If that’s not social Darwinism, I don’t know what is.
Less waste to entropy, would mean less demand to generate more electricity, because you're not losing entropy when the sun is feeding power directly to your house. But I gather there isn't a lot of money to be made from efficiency. The more I investigate grid connected solar, the more I realise it's about complementing fossil fuels and our existing economy - not standing apart at all. It seems consumers go to the expense of buying solar panels, taking all the financial risks that involves - only for the purpose of sending power back to the grid so we can buy it back.
Then shall come forth the Sons of the Morning
As one last activity, my brother AKA the ultimate Pirate, led all the other pirates on a scavenger hunt, collecting clues they headed from the powder room sink, to the bathroom tub, then the mailbox, sliding board, and as a finale, they discovered their final bounty back on the front porch.
Tenay and Taz are with Crimson live via satellite. The last time we saw Crimson, Joe attacked Crimson, and he said he had the tournament won, Bobby Roode won the tournament, congrats to him, but if he was in, he would have won.
So Paul made tents and how would it be done in those days? All by hand. The cutting was manually done with knives and they had to be sewn together, again, by hand. If you have ever had anything to do with cowhides, you know that it is exhausting work.
Wind turbine noise syndrome is a con. The power of suggestion conveyed by various media might have much to do with the anticipatory audio experience of wind turbines. Nina Pierpont a pediatrician in Malone, New York coined the term Wind Turbine Syndrome in a book she self published in 2009. Since that time her theory (promoted and distributed by her husband Calvin Luther Martin) of health related issues from exposure to wind turbines has been used by anti wind farm activists to foster fear and alarm. Fact is Nina Pierpont’s studies are flawed. Bad science may generate news headlines and used as a banner justifying a cause, but in the end if it is not supported by expert peer review it is still bad science.
On the topic of bringing back beer, I returned from Orlando with a few goodies. More on that later.
Users can now select scroll low temperature models from 2Hp thru to 6Hp in the load calculation software; Box Wizard, CalcRite and Calcu-Load.
3/4 cup lite mayo
Of anything,
Steven Mark Fogel, 40, Westfield, N.Y.
First, peel the freezer paper off the back of your photo. Then you are going to sew the side pieces first. One of either side of your photo. Place the right sides together and sew a seam.
Deer body language:
2- If the Summerfest is gone, the I would like to replace it on my shelf with another summer style beer
that human beings could travel fit neatly on a logarithmic curve that increased very slowly for centuries, through foot and steed to sailing and then steamship. Then overland train, automobile, airplane... an acceleration that breached escape velocity from the solar system! Projecting this curve beyond Voyager, it seemed the stars might be in our grasp within a lifetime.
I said, "Did Boy George sing "I'll tumble or I'll stumble?" (I'm hearing impaired - for years I thought Eric Clapton was saying, "Captain Midnight" instead of After Midnight.)
Ok so the pieces I've added to your wonderful creations are items I already own. I decided to draw them instead of pasting a bunch of photos together. Forgive me the colors didn't turn out well because I used markers, couldn't find color pencils.
Solomon works on behalf of associations nationwide to collect past-due fees from homeowners. He’s typically in favor of forcing delinquent homeowners to pay up.
Make sure there’s Diversity
Lead Game Designer
‘He followed his dreams
I stop assuming!
I can say all of this, and I’m actually pretty sure I didn’t even make them quite right. I don’t think I used enough cream - the amount called for is a range - and so my dough felt tough and heavy, and by the time I started to worry, I had already worked it too much to go back and add more cream. The biscuits looked puny going into the oven. Very sad, flat, unpromising pucks. But then! In the heat of the oven, they puffed to about three times their original height, and maybe even four. Yeow. What I’m trying to say is, you can’t screw this up. No one can screw this up. And first thing in the morning, that - that, and the company of a few favorite faces - might be the most a person can hope for.
Through this experience, I learned to appreciate where food that goes on the table comes from. I have fond memories of those summers on the farm.
I love the architecture too: the grand column in the middle of the seating area, the dark passage from Sutter to Market, and the great sunny widows, where I like to sit. When I want an even more serious focus in the air around me, I brave the treacherous stairs to the glamorous balcony, where the upper window, railing edge, and mirrored walls create an airy atmosphere that’s great for writing.
*He's also the kindest, gentlest, most smiley person we've met in France. I guess when you look like him, you can afford to be nice and kind to everyone; it's not like anyone's gonna mess with you.
My dining room is a part of my house I’m really excited to see come together because it has so much potential. Usually, I’m all over the place with ideas but for the dining room, I’ve known for a while what I want: Rustic Table, Modern Chairs.
Only a TV company that produces such mind numbing crap as Big Brother could be behind the plan to import the steaming pile of camel dung called Jabbar the Powerful into Our Country and use it to instil Islamic Values into our children.
6. Prankster Electronics
I met Khalida this summer in Boulder and I was amazed at her compassion, bravery and sweetness – and struck by her deep, abiding love for her country. I know this tragedy must be breaking her heart.
After tonight, I am revising this policy and seriously considering giving my baby cat up for adoption.
What We Need & What You Get
Do reviews affect your opinion of a book before you even have a chance to read it? Or do you avoid reading reviews until you're done with the book? ﻿
I just have things in our main living room and our kitchen area..
Of course, no trip to Amsterdam would be complete without a boat ride along the canals. There are many operators that offer short excursions, so set aside some time to arrange a canal boat tour. Also highly recommended: a day trip to Delft, a historical town famous for its beautiful blue and white pottery, known as Delftware. Delft is located very near Den Haag and Rijswijk, so it’s a good place to visit before or after conducting business at the NL Patent Office. And, as the name of this post suggests, tulips carry a significant importance in the Netherlands; they are a symbol of the country that you must see and enjoy while in the country. If you are in the Netherlands during springtime, visit the Keukenhof Flower Gardens in Lisse (about half way between Amsterdam and Den Haag). This flower garden is the world’s largest – wear comfortable footwear to amble through fifteen kilometers of walking paths among seven million flowers, 4.5 million of which are tulips of every color!
Listen! I’m twenty-one! What else is there to know……? OK!
I am not sure how to close this post. I know I've kind of rambled. The end result is that the movie challenged me in ways that I did not expect to be challenged. It has stayed with me, at least for a few hours, and I find it sobering. I pray that it is affecting others in a similar way.
Will the young upstart have a chance at stealing the champ's 'thunder', or will the king retain his crown as undisputed Heavyweight in the realm of all that is malty and Baltic? Find out later this week!
Bid darkness turn to day, wipe sorrow’s tears away,
I was shocked to discover that they force you to wear wooden shoes there,
We also did a song about shaking our eggs that includes following directions and STOPPING on cue. This musical rest is really challenging---it is hard to come to a stop all together! The song goes like this:
all the animals could speak.
Nope! There’s a well. But the water is extremely bitter. Only good for washing dishes. Drinking water you get from the train.
I feel so bad and he is so miserable. So much for a fun night.
I went again with this oh so cute "Lemonade anyone?" stamp by Belles´n´Whistles. I love their stamps - and this not because I was chosen as one of their guest designers but because of the fact that they are so wonderful and detailed!
"Now you see it!"
Even so, it suddenly felt quite impressive to realise that the Queen was one of my third level contacts
An influential and popular talent has threatened to resign from a large network because of a radio personality. Sources say the talent has been the subject of the radio personality’s recent blind items particularly the former’s alleged infidelity. The talent was quoted to have said, “Nasa iisang bubong kami ‘tapos ayaw n’ya akong tigilan. Eh kung maghiwalay kami ng asawa ko?!?”
I have already received one suggestion but would love your feedback on any others you would like included!
Everything is moving along great. I am hoping it continues this way. I couldn't be happier right now. Wish us luck in our new journey!
But nonetheless, I think we've got it to a stage now where I feel that there's been enough of a dramatic change to share.
♔ Summary
and forgive us our debts,
"Deeper into the Sherim?" Even to his own ears, Rel knew he'd failed; he couldn't manage more than a thready whisper. He was glad the two women couldn't see his face.
Bergen and Burke argue the global jihad movement is receding and al-Qa’ida under Zawahiri no longer has the capacity to launch the kind of attacks that made bin Laden, for a time, the Pied Piper of Islamic militancy.
I took the day off that day. Work just felt heavy so I decided to go apply at the casino the same day.
They were having a guest for dinner that night. Sarah was supposed to set the table, and Amy’s job was to pick out potatoes without spots for Sarah to peel. Mommy flitted around in her ruffled apron, pink to match her cocktail dress. Sarah had to peel potatoes because Mommy hadn’t yet got the hang of her new nails.
It's a simple truth that most of our students / pupils / ... are going to end up in different jobs, different personal lives, different careers, different locations, situations and quite possibly different countries and cultures. How could we prepare them for that any better than by helping them develop a healthy and realistic confidence in their own talents? In their personal, individual ability to contribute to the world?
Struggling to move,
7. Pleasure (White, Argent) 4:51
That's what happens when you start blogging I think.. next I'll be forgetting to wash or eat.
my cute corgi butt! You'd better believe I hightailed
Public holidays have always been days that seem to allow me to get more done than any other…. So it made sense to make tomorrow the final day, and make it a big one….
Like the Bellini this is another sparkling Italian wine. I was first introduced to this wine when I went to Italy with my parents. After an amazing meal the waiter brought each of us a complementary cordial of this sparkling red wine. We all loved it. It goes great with dark chocolate, but is not extremely sweet like most dessert wine. It would be considered a semi-dry wine, and works well as both an aperitif and a dessert wine.
And round it dancing in a ring, children from lands afar.
The news website also reports that “researchers with Carnegie Mellon University used facial recognition technology to identify college students who volunteered to be photographed for their study. By taking those photos and comparing them to photos found on social networking sites, such as Facebook, they were able to identify almost a third of them. That means they had profiles, ‘likes,’ interests and possibly family information”.
“I am here to explain what really happened (during the function) because I was present. I made the police report because I am very disappointed with the reports which have been made by those who don’t know what really happened,” he reportedly said.
...one week ago today, I said good-bye to my Dad. He was 89. God, I loved him. He was so strong, smart, loyal and loving. My Dad was born in 1920 in Ford's, NJ, in a basement on a cold winter's night. His father owned a little grocery store. He was the eldest of 3 children.
"Glowing with the returned auras of emotion, the two men weep... then turn and embrace over the ashes of feeling, the dust of sacrifice. Here, it is warm... outside it is bitterly cold. Perhaps no one else, on any world, would understand."
Her teacher is nice and funny and her teacher and I, according to Teagan, have the same hair.
I have a stack of light weight fabrics calling my name….especially this floral purchased at PA Fabric Outlet – marked 100% poly (of course) but it has a slight stretch so there’s something other than poly going on. I’m thinking wrap skirt or A-line skirt for my son’s college graduation. I love wrap skirts but sitting in them and maintaining modesty is a full-time endeavor. I’ll probably opt out of the wrap and think A-line for comfort.
But, a lot of my best times as a teen were spent in Glasgow.
I grew up in Somerset, England and got involved in folk music from childhood onwards. I studied painting at art school and then became a full-time musician touring solo around the UK and in Europe and a bit in the USA. After almost 10 years on the road I stopped touring and worked as a community artist combining my visual arts and music interests and working with other people; drama workers, dancers, textile artists, photographers and so on. I also carried on as a solo performer, singing and playing guitar and also playing bass in a couple of blues bands in England until meeting Bára and eventually moving to Iceland in 2004.
Turkey Burgers, Oven Fries, Green Beans
Label: BASF
3 offered
Next up a Rachel Allen Recipe….they would have been good to use as missiles in a Mediaevel battle recreation.
Related story:
Charred Grilled Seasonal Vegetables
2) Obama Voted Not To raise Debt Ceiling as Senator but lamented Racists trying to default on America’s obligations in order to shame and embarrass him because he’s Black. Sen. Obama first counted votes to make sure there were enough yes votes before making his symbolic no vote. Also, Bush eventually spent twelve point three TRILLION DOLLARS in borrowed money which remains as the highest deficit spending in the history of the Nation. Protesting this reckless spending was the right thing for Senator Obama to do. That President Obama would cut Bush’s Deficit in half is hardly a flip flop or a broken promise.
The P0rn Detection Stick is a thumb drive device that will search through all the images on your computer. Scan them for p0rnographic content, and create a report of suspected p0rnographic images. It even scans deleted images and Internet cache files so there’s no hiding Internet activity. This means even if Internet Explorer cache files are deleted, many images can still be recovered and scanned for p0rnography. Best of all, no software is installed on the target machine so they don’t know you’ve performed a search. You can even securely delete objectionable images…Paraben’s P0rn Detection Stick allows you to find images that potentially can include p0rnographic contents. Paraben’s P0rn Detection Stick scans an arrangement of images to determine attributes that indicate the image may be of a p0rnographic nature. It uses sophisticated, analytical processes; consisting of thousands of algorithms. These include 11 different detection methods to provide enough information to reliably distinguish between p0rnographic and non-p0rnographic images.
For his bride,to see
I'm not quite sure when exactly we'll begin this new building adventure since there are a number of things around the house that have to happen first - including an overhaul of the basement, but when it does, I'll likely be posting more photos of our progress. My miniature dream has been a long time coming and I am happy to be able to plan a project together with Mr. Confessions!
Routes any 16 sources to any 16 destinations with full cross-point capability. Resolutions are supported up to 1080p or 1920×1200. This matrix offers redundant power supplies so that if one should fail, the other will automatically power on, eliminating signal loss due to power cord failure.
If I have to stop fast you are going to hit us..
America, as always, is at the epicenter of new.
I have had a few questions about the dresses I make.
I'd never told him!
I got to play with an image from Tickled Pink Stamps and boy is she cute. Used papers from Papermania and added lots of blingy bits and some flowers.
I rarely toot my own trumpet (hehe!) but I will come out and say that this was an amazing dish! I came up with a simple, easy recipe for the vadas, as the vehicle to soak up those lovely yoghurty flavours.
Kianel here with you today with another card i have made with the dies i never used before or barely. Another challenge was to use colors i rarely use such as a combination of vibrant blue + green +pink.
but I wasn’t surprised
In the end, this story if filled with suspense and action, but made more real by the heart of Carver Young. Good luck putting it down.
Weekly, the folks at Teach Mentor Texts, Jen and Kellee, host the meme “It’s Monday! What are you reading? From Picture Books to YA” It’s a chance to recap what I’ve read in the last week and a peek at what I’ll be reading in the week ahead. Check out Jen and Kellee’s site to join in, or see the links of other readers to find out where their reading adventures have taken them. Click on the cover images for the synopsis of each book.
Shamen LSI (Love, Sex, Intelligence) UK
In planning out a site, whether large or small, one of the first considerations should be to determine the centre point of ‘the design. In any but very small sites there are likely to be required some buildings of a larger or more public character than the dwelling-houses — such, for example, as churches, chapels, public halls, institutes, libraries, baths, wash-houses, shops, inns or hotels, elementary and other schools ; and it would probably be well, having decided which, if any, of these are likely to be required, to group them in some convenient situation, and of them to form a centre for the scheme….
I went up to my old college last week and ran into several former classmates.
Basil (African Blue, East Indian)
2) I’m not sure the chapter on suffering (problem: why do innocent people suffer?) is quite as strong as I’d like. It is good, but I’d like to see something more. I suppose we all would. This book probably won’t hold up as the sole source for someone struggling with that particular question. Still a great chapter though – honest, compassionate, and hitting some really big nails on heads. Or hands, as it were.
Historians rely on letters, wills, diaries and census reports to construct stories, McCall said, and he has been working with folks at Drayton Hall since October to help fill in the holes on all its early residents. Much of the family’s early written records wound up at the Caroliniana room of the South Carolina Library, McCall said.
Like Kristy Bamu and Victoria Climbié, the five year old African child, whom the police named Adam (now believed to be a Nigerian child called Ikpomwosa) who’s headless and limbless body was found in the Thames, near London Bridge, was not the victim of a psychopath or a sexual sadist. Instead Adam met his death at the hands of a practitioner of tribal medicine, and his body parts, almost certainly cut from him while he was alive and conscious so as to increase their potency, were then made into medicines and potions.
With announcement of organization list for GSoC 2012 just a few days away, I started to get more and more paranoid, and stopped doing anything for couple of days. I took a break from my normal life, and watched few movies, tv-series, tweeted. The day had dawned, and I still had to wait for some 15 hours. At 12:30 AM, the organization list was announced. They hadn’t added all of the orgs yet, and luckily, I stumbled upon SimpleCV. I knew this was the one. I had to go for this organization. As I am taking a course on Image Processing, and had done some work in the field of Computer Vision earlier, SimpleCV seemed perfect. Without wasting a second, I joined #SimpleCV channel on IRC, found mentor Katherine Scott, with whom I talked about SimpleCV, how to begin, and what things I could contribute. It was a quick start for me. I downloaded and forked SimpleCV from GitHub, started reading documentation, tried some examples, looked through completer source code, made some changes. Katherine(kscottz, IRC nick) told me she was working on DFT, and color quantization. I also started working on DFT, made something, but I was getting some errors, converting it back. So, I asked this question on SimpleCV forum. I got a quick reply from her, and she mentioned she had almost completed DFT, and needed some examples, and test cases. I started working on it. I uploaded way too many filters, and pictures on imgur.
Preview for KARA’s upcoming Japanese single “Speed Up/Girls Power” + album covers revealed Mizuki Nana announces nationwide tour for the summer AKB48’s Akimoto Sayaka to appear on stage play “Roman Holiday” KARA’s Goo Hara re-signs contract with DSP Media Nogizaka46 becomes official supporters for “J League 2012″
Abandoning environmental discipline is what Ecojustice worries Ottawa is doing. Few details of the proposal have been made available, said Ecojustice’s executive director Devon Page. “But our basic take is that the federal government intends to roll back some pretty major aspects of Canada’s environmental laws largely to make way for major industrial projects,” Page said. “And that’s bad.” Ecojustice understands why companies are worried about excessive delays in the environmental review process. But a distinction has to be made between delay that is caused by having good laws in place and delays that are caused by the process itself, Page said. “I don’t think anyone would disagree that you need as efficient a process as possible but that’s completely different than speeding environmental processes by lowering the standards,” he said. “That’s what we think they are really talking about.” Putting a set timeline on a review doesn’t make sense as riskier projects should take longer to review, Page said. …
At Franks Lane, I turn left to cross the river, then a short distance along the puddled lane turn onto a narrow footpath between post-and-wire fences. On the left, the manicured outfield of Horton Kirby cricket club, while on the right, open parkland dotted with mature horse chestnut and collapsing ash trees, and limes, the crowns of which are festooned with mistletoe and noisy parakeets flitting between the tree tops. Somewhere beyond, over the river and obscured by the tree line, lies Franks Hall, built in 1591 by Lancelot Bathurst who frequently played host to Queen Elizabeth I here. Now Grade I listed, the Hall was used as a barn in the 1850s, before Vavasour Earle, who bought the Hall in 1883, enlarged it with the addition of a picture gallery. During the Second World war, when the home was used as a maternity home, Earle’s gallery was destroyed by incendiaries and now only the walls remain.
Now, being a bit more seperated from the direct work, it's been harder for me to get out of my reactive, more auto-pilot way of being. My mind is distracted, occupied. I have to really focus on being present and letting what feels so important in the moment go, so I can be with what really is important--this sweet family of mine.
Badger’s Tanglefoot was arguably the first of the wave of golden ales, being introduced well before the usual suspects of Exmoor Gold and Hop Back Summer Lightning. It was 5% ABV, but much lighter in body and more quaffable than the heavy, malty brews like Ruddles County and Royal Oak which in the mid-1980s were typical of beers at that strength. Not for nothing did the brewery for many years label it as “dangerously drinkable”.
A young man, who was also blind from a rare disease, came to me. No scientists had been able to help him. No doctors, either. He had an amazing attitude and didn’t ask me for anything. But when I held his face in my hands to greet him a remarkable thing happened. My sight slowly came back to me, and as I looked into his eyes, I could tell that he was looking back at me, seeing me. I awoke crying.
per se, or if it interacts with the last link in the chain of events
Luk 2:14 HCSB Glory to God in the highest heaven, and peace on earth to people He favors!
They both expressed how much they loved my class and how much I pushed them to work hard - I'm not know for being particuarly 'kind' when it come to working out ;)
Jason's folks had agreed to give us a place to crash on Saturday night, so we didn't have to look for a hotel, which was a relief on the first night. We got in a little late, since we left late, right before 8. Jason's mom was super excited to see Gabe and have a kid in the house. He was super hyper and ready to get out of the car. She made him hot cocoa and he had some cookies with it, and proceeded to act like a sugar-hyped monkey for the next hour. He'd had a late nap in the car, but I hadn't gotten much sleep and was exhausted. Patti played with Gabe a little and read him a story, and gossiped with me a while before we went to bed. I let Gabe stay up and watch a bit of a movie on the laptop, but I was so tired I just crashed.
Whenever something goes wrong in lab or someone is complaining about something my labmates say, “Add oil.” Well, they say it in Chinese, but the direct translation is add oil. The gist of the saying is that you need to just keep going or basically that you will find the energy to keep going. Or something like that… I guess if your car is out of oil, you should add oil and then the car can keep going?
Another 50 tonnes (for 80,000 people) had reached Kalam and was supposed to be distributed on 27 May after a relaxing of the curfew, Shahid told IRIN.
* 1 1/3 cup light brown sugar
Lill: How was your weekend away?
Challenge 11 will be a little bit topsy turvy. We are running late with our projects due to un-forseen circumstances and so I will be posting the DT projects as and when they turn up. I also have to announce the sad new that April will no longer be be on our Design Team. We wish her well and hope to see her joining in the challenge instead.
I got to know of him through this verse:
Lawrence Block's The Liar's Bible -- Lawrence Block is known for his great success in the mystery genre (especially his Matthew Scudder novels), but his writing books are what really stand out for me in his impressive body of work. This book is only available for download on Kindle or e-book, but it's well worth it. Liar's Bible, along with his other writing books, Telling Lies for Fun and Profit, The Liar's Companion, Spider, Spin Me a Web, and Writing the Novel, From Plot to Print, are indispensable in so many ways. Most of them are essays from a long-running column he did for Writer's Digest. I take a peek at any one of these books when I'm feeling down about writing. He takes away the "mystique" of writing. He is able to churn out a book in 60 days and he has a no-nonsense approach that makes anyone feel like if you just sit down and bite the bullet, you can finish that novel, that chapter, heck, even that page of writing that has been staring you in the face for weeks.
“Alice And The Flowers”: A dreamy and adventurous Alice setting in a garden of beautiful flora.
John’s father (Andrew’s Grandfather) owned an auto body shop near Ebbets Field. “Grandpa would see the players at the local bar. He would be talking to the Dodgers about baseball and all they wanted to talk about was cars.”
Hello ladies!!! Sorry for being so lazy posting reviews on this blog. As you can see i have new job now, so it means to say, less blogging and need to focus on training. Thank's insomnia and i can write reviews again. So here is my 1st haul for this October and i will try to post more reviews or even FOTD's this month.
you're absolutely lost in words here, without telling me anything about what's at stake. Consider this: FBI Agent Gina Russo is getting threats from a man everyone thought was dead. The FBI is worried enough to assign her an agent for protection. What she hasn't told him might get them killed, but Agent Joey Zicara finds himself falling in love with Gina and unable to walk away even though he knows she's keeping secrets.
She was so young. Not more than 19.
Mr. Think considered this, he said:
I'll probably save the hooded dress for funner occasions, but the grey one I shall wear more often!
Iván Meade - You have accomplished something very unique in the interior design world; creating a strong, extremely well recognized and beautiful signature style - In this same manner however, your style keeps evolving - How or where do you find your inspiration?
With the support of generous donors, Grameen Foundation began working in Latin America and the Caribbean (LAC) in 1999, but until recently had conducted all of its LAC-related activities from its headquarters in Washington, D.C. In 2009, the organization decided to decentralize and move closer to the areas where we operate, so we could support poverty-focused organizations and serve the poor more effectively and efficiently. Alberto Solano, Regional CEO for LAC, was in charge of opening the office, which would be in Colombia. He already had a full plate as the Regional CEO, so I was tasked with moving things forward. What a learning curve!
San Luis Obispo, California. The 26th annual California Festival of Beers takes over the Alex Madonna Expo Center and Madonna Meadows, at the landmark Madonna Inn, famous for its uniquely themed rooms. The weekend festivities kick off on Friday with a Connoisseur Dinner. Saturday sees a Grand Tasting throughout the afternoon, followed by a symposium and a home-brew competition on Sunday. (May 25 – 27)
They chose St. Coca’s Church and the Carton House in Maynooth, County Kildare, Ireland, to host their beautiful day. Scroll down for all the eye candy and for an in-depth chat with Kelly about all the details ...
Along came this lovely lass who asked me how much I was looking to spend. After I'd explained that I didn't want to spend much, she ushered us over to the expensive St. Tropez Self-Tanning stuff and proceeded to try and sell it to me. Oh gee... Why didn't I see that one coming?! After about 10 minutes of her trying her hardest to sell it to me, I was exhausted and out of objections, so ended up buying the damn stuff.
Cute, right? It was originally $118, marked down to $41, and after my gift card and an additional discount at the register, I walked away paying $15 for this dress. I also picked up a pair of dress slacks for $2.99. Can't beat that!!!! All together I saved 75% off retail.
Top Star & Master Flexxer - Ladies (white)
After March 24, investigation based toward proving the truth of Mangum's story rather than determining what actually happened.
Our Creative Corner challenges us to "cut it out," so after I embossed the Celtic stencil, I cut closely along the design lines and mounted it on my card with dimensional foam.
According to a quote from an unknown source—our forefathers called today “The Lord’s Day.” Our great-grandfathers called it “The Sabbath.” Our fathers and most of the world now call it “Sunday.”
I have voice mails that are archived and I should probably listen to them again before they delete themselves.
14And I said unto him, Sir, thou knowest. And he said to me, These are they which came out of great tribulation, and have washed their robes, and made them white in the blood of the Lamb.
Moon looked at Shag with ever so slightly sarcastic eyes.
On the plus side I have reached the last missing episode. Things will be decidedly easier from here on in. I actually can't express how difficult it was at times to focus on what was happening in some of those audio-only episodes. I now feel a combination of depression and elation; sad that I am reaching the end of Troughton, who has really become my new favourite Doctor, and excited about moving on to Pertwee and colour. But I'm getting ahead of myself, I'm not there yet...
Men to find out so many eccentric parts,
65 we
(It's certainly not an original idea, and certainly not mine - but it helps to be reminded.)
And the second, about Meiji Jingu in Tokyo:
Track coaches seem to have no problem with their athletes competing in both sports. Football helps keep the athletes in shape and competitive. Football also is able to funnel talented athletes their way via football scholarships, freeing up track dollars and increasing the flow of talent into the program. The seasons don't overlap, so after a brief period of getting over the bumps and bruises of the football season, the athletes are ready to roll early in the indoor season.
This query doesn't have much verve to it. You're trying to hard to be formal and businesslike. Cut loose. Give us something to chew on.
I write about my single life happenings which covers family, faith, tutorials, craft projects, and any other silly random thoughts that spring up in my head. I was so happy & honored when Meghan asked me if i wanted to do a guest post! I think she is so sincere and cool! Isn't lovely being able to connect with other women through blogging, especially when we may live so far apart? I think so! I love meeting new people, so leave a comment, say hi and if you blog, where you are at & i'll make sure to check it out! :)
Cake+
The decision to publish the information referenced in your request and the guide figures used were established at an informal meeting where no minutes were taken and as such there are no records held that can be disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act (FOI).
I am really bad lately about starting projects, almost finishing them, and then ignoring them with only one step or so to go.
BERSIH 2.0 demands for indelible ink to be used for all the upcoming elections. Failure to do so will lead to the inevitable conclusion that there is an intention to allow voter fraud.
The stock market is up!
x
beans she’d picked up at Peet’s and scooped the fresh grounds into her French Press.
Dr. Leena did say that I might be able to prevent further cavities by improving my brushing stroke. She asked the dental hygienist to show me how to make a circular motion on the gum, then move the brush over the teeth “in the direction they grow.”
You - devil worshipping Moslems within the Islamic Kingdom of Fortress Bury Park listen carefully to my words.
We told you recently about an effort by the 18 women running in the June 5 election for seats on the city's Democratic County Central Committee to band together to publish slate cards, hold fundraisers, walk precincts and mentor each other. It was supposed to show that women can change the often nasty tenor of politics.
I brought my mini Clif bar and my chocolate milk to packet pick-up the morning of the race. I'm still trying to figure out the perfect time to eat before running, but during most of my weekend training runs I eat about 30-45 minutes before I head out the door. I've found recently that the mini Clif bar and chocolate milk combo seems to work well. But, since we were supposed to pick up our packets and race numbers by 8:15 AM and the race didn't start until 9:00 AM, I waited to eat until after we'd arrived at the race venue.
"Formed in 1978, Polyrock was one of the first New York groups to explore post-disco/new-sensibility dance music. The sextet led by ex-Model Citizens singer/guitarist Billy Robertson gained unquestionable artistic credibility through the patronage of Philip Glass, who (with his producer, Kurt Munkacsi) produced and played on their two original albums. Polyrock combines minimalist repetition (the Glass influence) with electro-pop and smart, aware songs, then strips it all down to skin and bone for extremely singleminded dance music. Fascinating in its extremity".
- ‘For the Lord is the spirit, and wherever the spirit of the Lord is, there is freedom’ 2 Corinthians 3:17
But with that adorable face, who knows when that will be!? My father-in-law took the above photo of Gary when he was about 8 or 9 months... the same age as Connor is in this photo:
- Be woken up by whining puppy noises in the middle of the night after a long day…
Papadopoulos, who spent 17 years abroad with MSF and returned to her native Greece three years ago, sees hope among the rubble. “What keeps me going is an increasingly strong sense of solidarity among the Greek people,” she said. “Donations to MSF, for example, have of course gone down with the crisis, but donors keep giving, they remain active.”
In La Paz, Baja California Sur, Mexico Father Gomez Entropica shows wealthy womanizer Morty Martinez the finger of his ancestor de Salvaterra who lost it in defense of the monastery; the finger and a ring on it were saved, but the jewelry was stolen. The Father, seeing a picture in Forbes magazine of the ring, asks a favor that he believes the former Brooklyn resident can achieve. He wants Morty to visit sexagenarian Robert Tyson Grant in New York City to ask the billionaire to return a holy gold ring he wears to its rightful owner an orphanage in La Paz.
P ignored my question, threw the smock over me, then twirled me a round with a flourish. "Hmmmm, what are we going to do with you?" he said more to himself than me. "You sure you don't want hair sculpture. I can make you look like Snooki."
Bud Selig's stupidity in allowing two more playoff teams. Everybody gets to play!!!
Media Bar
There are many joys when it comes to motherhood.
When we begin to drive toward making things simpler, more consistent, and more
In 1989, a strong solar storm knocked out the power grid in Quebec, causing 6 million people to lose power.
Beatrix Potter, "The Tale of Peter Rabbit"
Then we took pictures of each other which some of the other patrons didn’t seem to appreciate. We anticipated someone eventually coming up to us with spurs on their boots, spitting out tobacco, and saying “Y’all don’t look like you’re from around here…” That’s exactly how different Budd Lake feels to me but maybe a bit exaggerated.
The numbers told the sad story of the Jimmy Carter presidency: interest rates of 21%; inflation at 13.5%, and an unemployment rate of 7%. And a relatively new economic device called “the misery index” – the combination of the unemployment and inflation rates which Carter had himself used to great effect in his 1976 campaign to win election – was at a shocking 20.5%.
The year before last, I handed the bankers all my money for the next 25 years (how's the loan repayment plan going on by the way, Mr Shitbag Clegg?). Last year I get handed a right wing coup d'etat instead of an election result. This year the BBC do this. I pay you all, for this kind of shit?
Bill Young
I am going to try to work on helping fund this new medication and procedure. Our percentage is pretty expensive.
that the world also knew to betray.
So I cartoon-ized a couple of old modeling photos of myself. The best thing about being cartoon-ized, is that it distorts my appearance a bit so that my hottness is not as blinding as it would be otherwise. Hehe.
CALLER: Is it OK to say that word? Is it ever OK to say that word?
Democrats in the Senate are the one group of legislators that have kept the tuition waivers alive in recent years.
Since Megan’s birthday was Saturday, I took cake and icecream to school for her class on Friday afternoon. We sang, blew out candles, ate, took pictures, prayed for Megan to be blessed in the coming year and left for the weekend.
It is so on.
Since Brooklyn-bound drivers were also exiting onto Sands Street (as they were actually driving the wrong way on the Manhattan-bound side of the bridge), it made for total gridlock.
Well with it been a anything goes theme over at Wild Orchid Challenge I thought it was time I got the pictures scrap booked from my grandma's 90th party and what better items to use with then some WOC ones and while I mention I will also add that they will give the winner a £15 voucher .
On Friday March 19, 2010, 6:33 pm EDT
Since you have worked so hard to get that traffic to your site and since most of them will never make a purchase from you or come back to your site, what do you really have to lose by trying to get them to sign up to your email list?
5.New Beginnings Academy
Because with tatting --- it is add-as-you-go, so the project can remain small, or it can be built upon to become a gorgeously, huge piece of work just by how many pieces are tatted to the previous piece.
The Nephew slept over Saturday night so I got to spend my birthday with my 3 favourite guys....Hubby, the Boy, and the Nephew! We watched a movie, watched the nephew get over tired from going to 2 other birthday celebrations, and had a massive Nerf dart gun battle. You know you are in trouble when you see this:
The other reason is mainly because I don’t know what to write about because I’m kind of stuck in gaming limbo at the moment. No one game has my entire attention right now. I’ve kind have been bouncing around between playing Mass Effect 3, Skyrim, Deus Ex: Human Revolution, (Deep breath now…) Fallout New Vegas, SW:TOR AND I’ve begun to once again miss WoW.
In anticipation for his visit we created a Dan Yaccarino book bin loaded with his books and studied in-depth the life of Jacques Costeau. Lauren (my co-teacher) and I were thrilled to note that Dan has written kid-friendly nonfiction books as the current push in education (with the Common Core State Standards or CCSS) is a focus on nonfiction texts. One student commented that The Fantastic Undersea Life of Jacques Cousteau is a nonfiction book that looks like fiction. This insightful comment springs from the fact that we originally categorized nonfiction texts as containing photographs and fiction, illustrations. This comment represented her growing understanding of the nuances to be found across genres. I mentioned her comment to Dan and he replied that this was his intention. He is well aware of the CCSS.
But on this Anti-Corruption-Movement coverage, Arnab is the only guy, I want to listen to. Over the past few weeks I perceive a change in his manner. he is no longer just a tv news anchor. He cares about what happens to and in the country on this issue.
Yay! This may come in the form of just a description of what I saw with my own two eyes, or maybe a picture I came across on the internet or wherever, or maybe a question of a 'do' or a 'don't.' I would LOVE LOVE LOVE feedback..........
Of course you can tweak this strategy to meet the needs of your students and/or the purpose of your instruction. Depending on the length of the text I may increase the number of facts and/or opinions that I would ask the students to find. I would love to use the articles from the Comprehension Toolkit so that the students could actually mark right on the article-especially the "x" I think that that would be cool.
Check all the supermarkets for food approaching sell buy date. They mark down drastically as the Brits refuse to eat anything that is near the end of its shelf life even if it is still perfectly good.
The first of these occurred on the morning after her memorial service. I came down the stairs into my kitchen – my now meat-free kitchen – and smelled the unmistakable aroma of freshly cooked bacon. The only other person in my house was my son, who was sleeping upstairs, and we are too far from the neighbours for anything to have drifted from their kitchens to ours. Now, if you knew Traci, then you know of her undying affection for bacon, and I can only think that smelling the bacon that morning was a little wry humour on her part, or maybe the universe on her behalf, telling me, Everything is going to be okay. There was another incident when a strong aroma provoked an association with Traci, which occurred to a friend, not to me, but before I get to that story, there is another one linked to it that I first described on March 27. Here’s a quick recap: Lisa, a friend from another city, sent me a photo of the orchids on her desk that had synchronistically opened on March 26, Purple Day, the International Day of Epilepsy Awareness, above Traci’s memorial service program.
The whole thing (besides the 2 small wine glasses on the side) is CAKE! The plate even lit up! :) Oh, did I mention it was delicious? lol
People (especially me) are constantly making God fit their expectations. For a long time I have been on a journey of seeking out the Truth and learning to discern the false prophets and false teachers that Jesus warned us of. There is no doubt that at times I get a bit radical but it is the result of strong convictions I believe God is laying on me. In some churches (at least some I’ve attended thru the years), much goes on that has no Biblical basis but I’m not sure that those involved there realize it or even truly intend it to be that way. It’s just how it’s always been or how they have been taught it should be … I think Jesus called that tradition.
Ever have one of those weeks where you just keep repeating the same mistake over and over? You know you shouldn't and yet you refuse to listen to your instincts. Maybe some of us are more wired to be like that. I don't know.
Gap Outlet Wedge Sandals $49.99
I don’t have to hunt for my food. Unless going to the supermarket
With my fondness for jQuery, I figured there had to be a way to add these buttons using only the Layout feature and a single HTML/Javascript gadget. After some experimentation, I discovered there does appear to be a way.
(973) 465-0777
happy new year all you lovely shoppers…hope this year is off to a good start for you…
You can book a place or discover more about the event, which is being held in association with the Society of Editors (Victoria), on the Writers Victoria website.
I have a brother and two sisters and yes, they were also unschooled.
So! Welcome to my four-months-post-partum list of Stupid Things That Make Me Crazy.
“My approach to this art project was to create an outfit that had the appearance of what I imagine a 1920′s sci-fi costume would look like.”
For the people where I live, it's a recipe for disaster.
The Most Important Work
His vision was blurring, but he looked up through the car windows to see someone standing on the other side. He reached his right arm up with an open hand. The figure on the other side of the car leaped into the air and landed on the roof of the cruiser, collapsing it several inches. The man looked up at what he had thought to be a boy, but the boy was shirtless and extremely muscular. The boy smiled and leaped again. He crashed down harder and caving the roof so it touched the headrests of the front seats.
This isn't entirely fair, but I'm going to write about If.... even though I still don't quite know what to think about it. I've been waiting to see If.... for at least 10 years now, maybe longer. It started with my teenage love of Malcolm McDowell, incepted with A Clockwork Orange, and then when I was about . . . fifteen? I caught a section of O Lucky Man! on cable. I didn't know what the fuck I was seeing, and it was basically impossible for me to find Man again, or to find If.... at all. Damn small-town video stores and the nascent interwebs.
Anxiety suffering has been such a burden but also a gift. Without it I don’t think I would have changed my thoughts on life. To me, now, going to the dentist is just like going anywhere else. There is no difference. You go there, get something done, and go. My thoughts definitely change the experience. That being said I would not be going to the dentist if my body was still in control. It now takes cues from me whether or not it should panic, and not the other way around – which is how it had been for so long.
This series has rapidly made its way to being one of my favourites. The characters, plot and description of everyday life make this fabulous reading. I can not recommend it enough, and am already pondering which Cornwell novels to read next!
They are fairies but still match the butterfly (and garden/flower) theme. At first I wanted cupcakes with butterflies on top, but after seeing this cake I will scratch the cupcake idea.
Every morning, I wake up and ask this one question: when will Germany come to its senses and pull out of the euro? After all, Germany is the only real engine of the European Economic Community. Greece’s GDP…it’s less than 10% of Germany’s GDP.
The effort, now known as InterOccupy, started out of Occupy Wall Street in New York in mid-October. It has since grown into an elaborate website with multiple weekly phone calls during which occupiers trade ideas, coordinate multistate actions, and plan for the future. Participants at about 150 occupations around the country (and a few internationally) have now participated in the calls, organizers tell me.
In the criminal justice system, a 2011 study commissioned by Israel's courts administration and Israel bar association revealed that almost half of Arabs receive custodial sentences for certain crimes, compared to a third of Jews. While 63.5% of Arabs convicted of violent crimes were sentenced to prison, only 43.7% of similar Jewish offenders were.
We wrote four of these. (The others will be showing up soon.) I did notice my linking-and-shifting muscles limbering up after a while. I think.
I'll make you understand
Hey guys! I've been a huge fan of Dooney & Bourke for years and years. I've admired their bags for so long, yet was never able to purchase one... You may remember this post, where I shared a favorite accessory of mine, the most beautiful watch ever ;) This watch, given to me by my mother a few years back, was the only Dooney item I owned...until now!
Without going into a full vetting process with these gentlemen I can say that they have both spent a lot of time with this sport and have shown that they have the skill set necessary to perform the job of CEO of USA Track and Field. I think that that is the kind of combination that would ultimately help move us forward and put us back in the position globally that we should be at. So if I were to look within the sport for someone to take the helm these are the individuals that I would look at as potential candidates. At the very least these are the type of individuals that I think should be sought out to try and get the sport back on track (pun intended) here in the US.
Back in the US last month, I went to my first yoga class with friends. I was pretty impressed with how good I felt, despite being the "Problem Child" as my friend dubbed me because I didn't know what the hell I was doing. (In reality, she was just jealous that I got a 30sec. back massage from the teacher. I bite my thumb at you E, pffffffff.)
I was really pleased with the flavor of these cupcakes. I highly recommend eating these with a fork. The graham cracker crusts on the bottom and top are very crumbly, which makes it even more like eating the "real thing." The chocolate cake was so moist, and it's surely going to be my go-to recipe from now on. I got the recipe from Paula (originally from the book, Modern Baker by Nick Malgieri), and she was so helpful in answering all my questions about making these cupcakes.
Source: Reuters
Like sentenced to life guilty
Feels false and happens false
So let me get this straight. You didn't think I needed the whiteboard that was hanging on my wall, with all kinds of information written on it, that I didn't need but wrote down anyway. Because that's how I waste my time at work.
But maybe you don’t want to think about that. Maybe you just want me to stop talking. Luckily for you, in a lot of places you actually can make me do that. In a lot of places, your right not to think too hard about the impact of your actions is more important to the people running it than the actual impact of your actions. Those places are probably really comfortable for you, and I’m sure you would fight to the death to keep your thought-free verbal theme park free of consequences or accountability for your heedlessness.
Author, Quantum Wellness, vegan. Influenced Oprah Winfrey to try 21-day vegan cleanse!
I found The Hunger Games to be a very powerful book, with a terrifyingly well-realised world, some strong characters and a lot of action. Yet I'm not quite sure what the secret is. There are a lot of aspects of this book that usually turn me off a story - even if you leave out the evil that is the Hunger Games contest itself. I often don't like hardened, tough, cynical protagonists, and Katniss has aged before her time. She has had to. Her father is dead, her mother went to pieces with grief, and she was left as the head of the family in a brutal world. She has to be strong to survive, and she is presented as a realistic product of her upbringing. More than that, she is a real character, three-dimensional, understandable if not always sympathetic. Peeta, her companion from District 12, is quieter, at first glance weaker, a bit of a drip - or at least, that is how Katniss sees him. Yet as the story progresses and Katniss gets to know Peeta better, Peeta reveals an inner strength that was previously hidden.
“We heard that Parliament could be dissolved any time now. But we feel it is better for it to be done after Kaamatan so as not to disrupt the celebrations,” Parti Bersatu Sabah (PBS) information chief Datuk Johnny Mositun was quoted as saying by The Star today.
The controversial law has received strong criticism from the Florida
Last week, I wrote about how time can affect how we look upon a particular set. This week, I want to take note of how sets from the prior year (and the next year) affect our perception as well. For example, was 1991 Topps really that good of a set or was 1990 Topps so bad that it made it look that good? For that the answer could be both, but sometimes you really have to think about it. There are several instances of this phenomenon that pop up among the 61 (major) Topps sets and the next group of five will highlight a few of them. One follows a particularly memorable set, one comes before a memorable set, and one comes after a string of very forgettable sets.
Finally, why should we believe that Romney’s policies — basically tax cuts for the rich, as usual — would yield great economic results? Well, I guess you can point to Bush’s example; how did his administration at this point compare with Obama? From BLS data:
Thursday: Worked on book notes and rationales. Ethan was having a pretty crappy day, so we self-medicated by going out to eat and then to the midnight showing of The Avengers. Seriously, #1 midnight showing, #2 a superhero movie, #3 in 3D, and #4 while prepping for exams. Not to toot my own horn or anything...but, yeah, I'm a sweet wife! We got there an hour early, so I brought my laptop to work on exam notes. I actually got some good work done in that hour! I had assumed, however, that it would be only nerdy guys at a midnight showing of this movie. Boy, was a wrong! A row of d%^che b@g hicks sat behind us. Luckily, they were okay during the movie. It was that hour beforehand that was driving us crazy. Where have all the nerdy boys gone?!
When they do meet, the search for earthly treasure will pale in comparison to what God has planned for both of them.
that's what i had planned, actually; i went with the mother's day idea b/c that holiday is fast approaching, and i wanted to go verrrrrrrrrrrrry pink and frilly ('cause you know i LOVE THAT!) but then i found this lovely little tulip illustration in a vintage plant book, and i knew my MIL would adore it, so i built the rest of the card around that!
If you stalled out in the middle of that long paragraph, here's the short version: any book published in France--which would include translated foreign-language books--that went out of print in France--not necessarily elsewhere--before 2001, can be scanned into a database. If authors--who may or may not be notified of their inclusion--do not opt out within six months, they lose control of the digital display and sale of their work.
PLACE: Home
So back to the travels! How would I sum up in a word the beauty and intriguing culture and land of Thailand and Indonesia... Delicious, Genuine, and absolutely take you breath away Beautiful! Ok that's more than one word but one word is not enough to describe a land of caring people, beautiful land, and absolutely delicious food. So here are some photos to capture a few of the moments.
At the start of the week I heard a second-had bookshop was closing down and selling everything for a dollar. I was working all day Monday and Tuesday, so I had no time to check it out. I tried on Wednesday and Thursday but they were closed. I went to a shopping centre today, and they had another second-hand bookshop from the same chain (called “Booklovers”) and they had all books half price. It got me wondering if the whole chain was going out of business or what. Anyway, I bought seven books there for $23.50.
With an enemy hot on his trail and his faithful demon companion determined to remove Olivia from his life, Aeron is trapped between duty and consuming desire. Worse
They came from another world, fleeing fire and death, pursued by their hated enemy, the Jotun. They crossed the vastness of space travelling within the nothingness, that place between the icy emptiness of space and the fiery blaze of the stars, finding a way their pilots could navigate using their evolved minds and ability to sense beyond the physical. To this world they came, finding it a restful respite from the pursuit that hunted them for so long.
Just a quick post on my Cheetah print mani today. This is one of the more popular stamping manis out there, because it is funky, fun and easy to do! Even though the stamping could be crisper, I am quite happy with the final product!
Washington gov Gregiore: (360)902-4111
So I turned my focus to experience points. With the completion of each level, I calculated how many experience points to the next. I sought new avenues for gathering experience points.
BTW – to post this clip first I upgraded my WordPress account so I could post videos. Then I had to buy Quicktime Pro so the video would play properly. And all I’ve got to show for it is a 30 second video of it pouring with rain in South London during the rush hour. And it doesn’t even look like a rush does it?
Master of mystics; Guide of the World; All-Attractive…
I guess the fact that Jen is an Asian and she’s also petite brings me closer to her. I’ve been following her for about a month and I’ve come up with a list of things which were introduced by her that I’m interested in. Now that I’m going to renew my visa and I’m not working, my budget is currently pretty tight. I’m not going to purchase all of them at once, but I will get them gradually according to my needs. This list is to help me keep track, because obviously Jen has tons of products that I won’t need them all.
Princess took while we were on
We decided to seek each other out. We advertised and were contacted by about thirty writers who were keen to meet and talk.
I’ll be able to move this in a week, tops.
to play in the waves
In 2010, there were 218 new posts, growing the total archive of this blog to 519 posts. There were 350 pictures uploaded, taking up a total of 29mb. That’s about 7 pictures per week.
(image credits to wikepedia.com)
Lurtz’s horde had Ugluk, an uruk captain, an orc standard-bearer, 8 uruks with sword and shield, 10 with pikes, 7 uruk scouts, and 9 orc archers.
Hmmm... Anyone have a great plan?
A healthy life is all about the water, and the health of any animal or human is determined by maintaining the purity and akalinity of that water - first from without (our earthly oceans) and then from within (our bodily oceans).
In reality, part of me was ready to cry because I couldn’t believe I ate half a bowl of freakin’ egg custard and I should have gotten the chocolate cake and it’s pretty bad when even you realize you’re the most immature person on earth on top of the fact that I just lied to my dear friend on her daughter’s birthday.
Oh Lizzy, you sweet, sweet girl. I think I might blink and you'll suddenly be a teenager; you're growing up too fast! I am so glad to be your mom. I love your spunk. I love your sweetness. I love your go-and-get-it attitude. I love that you curl up and bury your head in my neck before I put you to bed. I love that you are willing to try anything. I love that you feel safe with your brother when I am not near. You are tough. You are loving. You are happy. And I couldn't be more.
Umm, but you ARE hearing what I think, in an uncensored way…
The security forces caused 518 deaths (5.6%) throughout this period.
Tara felt the blood rush to her cheeks. “I admire you a lot, rather worship you.” She finally found her voice.
This is going to be a brief post, as I am exhausted. Today I traveled some distance, needing no less than three different trains, to get to the nearest pituitary patient support group.
There are many of us, however, who have an inordinate and unhealthy desire to please everybody. We fear being “on the outs” with people–the more significant, the deeper the fear. Corollary, we yield to the corresponding urge to bend over backwards to please.
This International Standard provides guidance on the development and use of measures and measurement in order to assess the effectiveness ISMS.
you can get addicted to a certain kind of sadness/ like resignation to the end, always the end/ so when we found me could not make sense/ well you said that we would still be friends/ but i’ll admit that i was glad it was over
No PO Boxes!
It really isn’t a castle in the sense of the castles dotting the landscape of Europe. Instead, it is a mud-walled fortress occupying the entire hilltop overlooking the valley. Inside the walls there are numerous buildings of various design and states of disrepair. The mud-walled buildings are from before 2001, but no one can tell you for sure how old they are. They, along with the walls of the Castle, require routine maintenance/rebuilding as the rains wash away the mud. The ANA Captain that gave me a tour last fall said most of the mud buildings were probably nor more than 100 years old. he said the caverns in the hilltop were older, but there are no records or pictures to know for sure.
Briana has picked out a name for the baby! She decides to name her Nova which makes me think of Novalee Nation (and her daughter Americus) on the movie Where the Heart Is. It's decidedly better than one of the choices she threw out - Bliss - which, thankfully, Moms told her sounded like a stripper name.
Enough about my rough schedule. On to things that make me smile and think, "will this day ever come?!" More blush and gold inspiration...
Or was he wrapped
Q: I don’t think you should.
CAN SHORT STORIES BE WRITTEN IN PRESENT TENSE? Sure! In fact, many great short stories are present tense. The reason the shorter genre is ok for present tense: you're sustaining the narrative for a shorter period of time, and often focusing on tense moments or short but deep plot arcs. A short story is a great place to explore moment-to-moment action or emotion.
(OK so the bag is a little bit on the gigantor side, as is her hair, but I'm looking at the outfit, not necessarily the styling. Guess is always a little bit over the top; I'll forgive them).
* Auto-Correction
#4) Lappert’s Icecream. I often stopped by here after a day at the beach. This adorable icecream shop is in the Kukuiula Shopping Village in Koloa. If you see some cute old-timey looking shops in a red building, you’re there. You can get a cone and walk around the shops while you eat. My favorite is the Kauai Pie…Kona coffee icecream swirled with chocolate fudge, coconut flakes, macadamia nuts, and vanilla cake crunch. I was addicted.
Of the four use cases, the Marker follows y as a function of x in two and x as a function of y in the other two. We can’t use the function graphing engine to manage the Marker display as it always calls the base function (parabola) eval() method with an input x-coordinate. The derivative and normal displays won’t work in two cases because dy/dx is not uniquely defined.
This is kinda tough for me. I'm not too big on me ... like to the point where sometimes I have self esteem / self confidence issues. So ... 5 things ... man ... I can't even complain about this topic because I picked it. Durn.
Contemporary art is used to degrade us by destroying any notion of the Sacred needs of people. Every year these time-warped artists stage a ritual by setting up an ordinary member of the public. The script is this: an elderly person takes a youngster, say grandchild or niece, to an exhibition and is shocked by something on display, like an unmade bed or something that requires little imagination, and complains to the press. Then the curator is quoted as saying, “Art is to make people think, and to provoke feelings”. This hackneyed response has been used on each occasion for the last 30 years.
I'm not hugely upset about the actual bike, it wasn't terribly expensive or nice, but what frustrates me is that a) a free, energy-efficient, exercise-inducing, (almost) carbon footprint-free mode of transportation was taken from me, and b) the fact nothing else was taken (I'm glad nobody else lost anything, but I don't understand it), so it felt like a conspiracy.
And that is the definition of "for the public good..."
My idea of American policy toward the Soviet Union is simple, and some would say simplistic. It is this: We win and they lose. What do you think of that?
Failing that, I'd like Jayne to end up in an all-night bar in Bangkok with Phillip Marlowe and grill him until he explained what the hell happened in The Big Sleep. And then shag him.
As for mods, there really aren’t that many. You may remember that I really, really prefer knitting my socks toe-up, but I just didn’t have the energy to convert this pattern. I didn’t want to lose the cool foot, and my brain is just way too all over the place to create some nifty solution. Instead, I bit the bullet and followed the pattern.
If you’ve been with this blog since last summer, you’ll remember my adventures with making homemade tomato sauce. After acquiring the necessary tomatoes and hours of cooking, I was left with eight beautiful jars filled with a jubilant red and deliciously thick tomato sauce. And, after a bit of number crunching, I came to the conclusion that each jar cost me over $6 before all my effort and time. This summer the goal is to acquire free tomatoes – a.k.a. homegrown.
Quotes of the Podcast: “It was the worst thing I’ve had the pleasure of watching, no wrong word, the misfortune to put myself through since the last time I watched The Vampire Diaries. So I guess judging it on that scale….it was just another Thursday. But judging it on a separate scale, it was particularly worse than usual.”-Olu
YES: 45 Democrats and 28 Republicans
Cadbury Mini Eggs just might be in attendance for dessert, so get your daily vegetables in while you can...and make that lonely lanky asparagus happy!
Margaret Ann Mabry
3. Gregory Peck (The Blue and the Gray, 1982)
Rub all parts of the chicken with the oil. Place on a roasting rack set over a roasting pan. Blend the salt and za’atar together in a small bowl, then sprinkle the entire chicken with the spice mixture. Fold the wings behind the chicken’s back, tie the legs together, and sprinkle any remaining spice on any bare spots.
Playwrights’ member organizations that provide production and development opportunities for playwrights, especially those that maintain prestigious (and free) “residency” programs for a select group of playwrights, are also jumping on the submission fee bandwagon, especially in the current economic downturn. Those fees can range from $40 a year for The Playwrights’ Center of Minneapolis (which buys you access to a submission-opps newsletter, some script-review resources, and access to some local programs) to hundreds of dollars annually (such as the Chicago Dramatists’ Playwrights’ Network, which in my opinion does not offer a good return on investment.)
They’re back again this year and it’s fun to watch their antics.
Root beer cake. Yeah, I know. Sounds like something Ernest Matthew Mickler would've praised. But I stumbled across a recipe for just such a thing while reading Andrew Carmellini's new book American Flavor and it struck a nostalgic chord. I've also been on soda and baking kicks lately as well as preparing to move (we bought a house this week), so anything that reduces the number of cans, bottles, and boxes from the kitchen larder or the liquor closets get boosted to the top of the to-cook, -drink, -make list.
And here is the most important part. He says:
The social networking results compared with the partisan knowledge gaps which remain consistent according to Pew makes perfect sense when combined, because if liberals refuse to draw on a knowledge base simply because they disagree and will delete, unfriend or completely ignore someone who disagrees politically, then they are limiting their knowledge pool to sources that agree with their own "opinion" rather than sources that could offer additional facts. .
I winced, my body was sore from last night’s usual events. Jack had been rougher than usual lately; he had started hitting me not long after I moved in with him about one and a half years ago. However something changed this week, I felt like I was losing him to whatever demon it was that seemed to plague him every day.
And listen to Sarah P.’s advice
I have looked at going back into office work but it frankly doesn't appeal. I have four kids, as you all know, and being there after school and on the odd school trip etc is important to me. So I need a flexible source of potential income.
While the issue of my endorsement did not come up, I certainly have heard from many of you who have weighed in on whether or not I should issue a formal endorsement. Thank you for your counsel, it has been most helpful. However, I felt that it was completely impossible for me to even consider an endorsement until after a meeting to discuss issues critical to those of us who often feel our voices are not heard by the establishment: social conservatives, tea-party supporters, lower and middle income working families.
It's a pity really; the addition of a miscellaneous group of sometimes questionable reliability or loyalty, largely reliant on the PCs for their very survival, can add an interesting social element to running a party. It actually makes Charisma useful, instead of becoming the inevitable dump-stat. And if, as we were, the players are basically decent types who played basically decent types, the very vulnerability of the hirelings to a ridiculously dangerous environment can provide the DM with a host of side-quest ideas.
I told friends and family about Peter, about what I was learning, about Law of Attraction, etc. Every single one of them didn’t trust Peter, thought I was romantically interested in him or he in me, they just couldn’t grasp that men and women could be friends only. They figured he must have some ulterior motive. I couldn’t understand why they weren’t happy for me, for my new, happier way of life. I learned eventually to not share my excitement with them and to find a new support network that would get it.
9. Hotel service generally stinks. Most of the hotel staff was unhelpful when it came to directions. I would ask the doorman if he knew where a particular restaurant was located, and he acted as if he had never heard of it. The restaurant was a 30 second walk away. A Tales volunteer and I asked a hotel staff member at the Monteleone about the location of a room inside the hotel, and she did not know. I'm unsure if hotel staff across the city truly didn't know about rooms and other businesses in New Orleans or if they were trying hard to be really unhelpful. Nonetheless, it isn't very much like traditional Southern hospitality.
I had given my sister carte blanche to book our spa treatments, because, as a formerly starving student, my spa experience was limited to standing outside and staring at people through the window while dragging my hands down the glass.. Michael Myers style.
(Jack Foster, Irish Philosopher)
According to Bloomberg, Lembaga Tabung Haji (LTH) holds the largest stake at 22% in the company while Berjaya Corp Bhd (BCorp) owns almost 21%.
What if I'm not ready for them, though? The changes.
m - merry
I’ve never seen an episode of this but I have caught this theme numerous times as I’ve gone somewhere else whilst the OH settles down to watch it. I like the quirkiness of the theme: the instrumentation as well as the off-kilter rhythm.
What You Should Know About an HDMI Splitter
What can everyone take away from this episode of the Stupid Boss Files? That owning to your responsibilities in everyday life will help you build your integrity. Integrity helps strengthen personal relationships as well as professional ones. Teaching my children about integrity has been focus area for me – especially where my youngest is concerned. Her ADHD and anxiety make her a particular target for irresponsibility and I cannot emphasize to her enough that everyone makes mistakes, but what will set you apart from others is your ability to own up to your mistakes and to take your consequences with dignity.
At our core, unless we are fully enlightened, we all are uncomfortable in some way with our shadow. There are parts of ourselves that we do not like, and certainly that we do not want others to see. When we are presented with the possibility that we may avoid doing the work in our own dirty basements by following a shiny leader on a path to the promised land without turmoil, we sign on the dotted line and project perfection on a limited individual in an imperfect world. We are bound to be disappointed. Disillusionment is just the collapse of illusions that we needed to humbly see beyond in order to evolve. Disillusionment is an act of Grace.
And then the friend says, “You’re still having trouble getting over that? Didn’t you already have 4 years of therapy? Well, ok……whatever.”
Dear God,
The first is a beautiful scrapbook, ready for photos and adorable notes about bathtimes and bedtimes and first vacations. The second is a smaller, thinner version, meant to record dates and milestones.
In this article, you can find many such gems as: “While many young couples choose the military as an escape from their community or their situation like a teen pregnancy, or simply being in love and not wanting to have to deal with the hardships that a long distance relationship can bring. Is marriage the right chouse? Lets take a look.”
I know I could have done better but am very happy with my numbers it being the holidays and all the traveling I have done.
When do you clean? I use a 'pick up as you go' method, so it seems like I'm cleaning and picking up all day long sometimes, but it works the best for our family. As for the daily and weekly tasks, I get up early and start a load of laundry, pick up a little here and there, and try to do some cleaning at that point while the house is quiet. My kids help when it's appropriate (pretend vacuum, little dusters, cleaning cloths).
Needless to say, the women in the happy, committed, relationships felt less pain while being shocked the second time, as they held their lovers hands.
There are some stars that are stars even from the womb. In Luke 1 v 13 -17 even before John the Baptist was born, it has already been prophesied that he will be great. Some people are created stars.
As an introvert, writing is never the same as thinking/reflecting for me because writing takes place in the external world. In particular–there is always a lag between the two. I think and reflect first–often for a while–and only after thoughts are collected and organized–are they then written in what is a fairly permanent and enduring form. For extraverts–this might be different… or maybe not. I know that for me–writing is very similar to talking–I almost never do either without first thinking exactly about what I want to express–whereas I know a number of extraverts who quite often use speech and talking with others as a way of doing their thinking/processing–because, for them, the external world is the primary reality–and thus–to make a thought real, it has to appear in this external world. Just thinking about it internally doesn’t seem as real to them…
1. On My Own
Do that once again, Micha, andI swear I'll leave
I became very aware of digital art in college. Then I fell off of it after graduating. When I was able to get the Adobe CS4 on my laptop (Creative Suite which has programs like Photoshop, InDesign & Dreamweaver in it, CS5 is already out w/ even MORE wicked tricks & applications) I started buggin out with it! Creating graphic art (creating art through digital means) & graphic design (laying out graphics through digital means, like ads) is full of possibilities. It’s also quick (unlike traditional art) to work with, depending on the project. And even though drawing & painting are first for me & are the cornerstones of visual art, there is an endless range & array of visual effects you don’t always get w/ traditional art. It’s like magic using your computer! I have heard even the most professional digital artist say “you can never learn all of Photoshop.” It’s that complex. It’s waaaaaaaaaaay more than simply airbrushing celebrities for a magazine. You’d have to use it to understand…
I never really understood Algebra.
The Press pays little attention to the national democratic revolution, but the ANC is committed to it. This is one of the risks we face. Another is that tougher affirmative action requirements lead to a drain from the country of the most skilled segment of the population.
Before he knew it, the coach had stopped again. Was it collecting another soul? Were they in Hell already? He peered outside through the velvet curtains and saw lights of windows, many lovely lighted windows. An inn. Thank God, he had reached civilisation again, he was back among humans.
(Wow, a lot of PC housekeeping in my future!!)
In less than 5 months you'll turn 25! Can't stop dreaming of 'you at 25'! You're my inspiration to rebel today, you know?Rebel with a cause.
“Is it just me, or does that look like a … a camel to you?” she asked incredulously.
When we return from Spring Break, we have one week until the Writing STAAR here in Texas. So, we have practiced our test taking skills for the last few weeks on test-like passages. Our district calls this "Bridging to STAAR". We are doing this in both Reading and Writing, two times a week. I think my students have had enough. I have had enough. Don't get me wrong, it is essential that they practice test-taking strategies (NOT teaching the test), but things become boring and repetitive. There is only so much excitement you can put into a story, questions, and answer choices. Today, I had four students need to go to the nurse and about 20 really, really, really needed to go to the restroom because "It's an emergency!" Right. I wanted to go to the restroom AND the nurse, too. But...we soldiered on.
I’m extremely disappointed that the sport is acting as antagonist in this regard. It should be the job of the federations and the IAAF to provide “support” for the athletes. All too often, however, the rules of the sport are set up to treat the athlete as enemy instead of the “commodity” that they are. The athletes are the reason that EVERYONE associated with this sport gets paid, yet they are the ones with the most limits imposed upon them.
To most gamers, time saving DLC sounds like the punchline to a joke. Unfortunately, the laughable reality is that people are willing to pay for this kind of thing. Time saving DLC is a downloadable pass that unlocks all characters/maps/features of a game. The best example would be the Time is Money Pack in Skate 3. For 560 Microsoft Points, “Time is Money will unlock all locations, skaters and gear, and Skate.Park objects that can be earned by playing through Skate 3′s career and online modes.”
Free.
Ninotchka almost seems scandalous in how heavily Garbo’s character pushes the message of the evils of capitalism and the glory of communist Russia. One can forget all that, however, when the leading lady starts living life to our own delight. Garbo is so charming as the naive adult entering such a luscious society, but she also plays the brutally stoic role perfectly. Douglas, meanwhile, could not be more charming. I feel like as an actor he largely failed to make his mark or distinguish himself from the mass of similar leading men, but he really is swoon-worthy here. I find the duo particularly enthralling in a late-night scene in Leon’s apartment after “little father” the butler has been sent home. Garbo’s growling of “again” as a request for another kiss is hilarious, endearing and unexpected all at once.
We CPAs are not all afraid of new, dynamic, and fresh looks. Some of us, however, are not very pleased with the default font in Office 2007 programs. Where most professional correspondence is prepared using a more conservative font, the default Calibri is not always taken seriously.
09. Rude Girl
After the lecture, I asked the consultant about his work with dietitians and any inside knowledge of whether there might be any opportunities for voluntary or unpaid work or work experience. He was moderately encouraging, and I have emailed him as we agreed, but so far have heard nothing.
The benefits are numerous. A prime location, for one. Near the intersections of 2nd Avenue and Houston Street, one can quickly cut cross-town and up the West Side Highway, or hit the East River and take the FDR up to the Bronx and Queens. Three bridges take you right into Brooklyn. So when the pager beeps, you're good. Throgg's Neck and Mill Bay and Ridgewood and all of Staten Island are still a headache. But in the words of one Daily News photographer, "we don't go out to Staten Island unless they're throwing their babies off the Verrazano bridge."
This little guy made his debut into the world right on time!! I couldn't believe it! Eliza was 2 weeks early and 5 lbs 10 oz. so I was anticipating an early, and small baby! BUT much to my surprise, this little guy came exactly on my scheduled c-section date weighing nearly 2 pounds more than little Ellie bug!
So, I recently decided to try Annie Sloan Chalk Paint for the first time because...
